🧠 Knowledge Operating System — Master Hub
========================================
Latest Verified State — 2026-09-26
RSH-17 latest audit cycle: CKC-RSH17-010 = COMPLETED / VERIFIED. KNG-43 provenance content is verified at 31 Evidence Links including EVD-RSH17-LONG-01.
Attribution caveat: KNG-43 records Last Changed By Cycle = CKC-RSH17-009, but the separately fetched CKC-RSH17-009 record documents duplicate-source audit / NO_CHANGE. Exact provenance-write attribution is therefore AMBIGUOUS; the persisted relation itself is VERIFIED.
Research state: RSH-17 = Needs Follow-up. Direct financial-performance evidence exists observationally/longitudinally, but robust causal identification and full analytics → agility → financial-performance mediation remain open.
KNG-43: SYNTHESIZED; Conflict Status = NONE; no ACTIVE promotion.
State precedence: The verified block immediately below is authoritative for the current operational state. Older snapshot sentences later in this page are historical and must not override it until explicitly reconciled.
CURRENT VERIFIED STATE OVERRIDE — 2026-09-26
Latest substantive RSH-17 research cycle: Longitudinal competitive-advantage boundary test = COMPLETED / VERIFIED. A separate duplicate-source integrity audit was also completed with NO_CHANGE / VERIFIED.
RECON-RSH17-PROV-001 is a separate user-triggered provenance reconciliation record; it is not a research cycle and has auto Cycle ID CKC-64.
CKC-RSH17-009 — Integrate longitudinal Saudi retail evidence into KNG-43 provenance = COMPLETED / VERIFIED; it added EVD-RSH17-LONG-01 to KNG-43 without changing the semantic Knowledge State.
KNG-43 = SYNTHESIZED; Conflict Status = NONE; Evidence Links = 31 persisted refs, verified after write.
The Alghamdi & Agag (2024) source is represented by canonical SRC-RSH17-005 → EVD-RSH17-LONG-01; duplicate source records are not independent evidence.
Next research gate: randomized/strong quasi-experimental identification of market agility → firm financial performance, followed by direct full mediation testing.
Latest Integrity Check — 2026-09-26
RSH-17: latest validated cycle = CKC-RSH17-009, NO_CHANGE / VERIFIED; a duplicate Source record for Alghamdi & Agag (2024) was detected and bounded to canonical SRC-RSH17-005. It is not counted as independent evidence and was not deleted silently.
KNG-43: SYNTHESIZED; Conflict Status = NONE; provenance remains reconciled and verified.
Research priority: resume RSH-17 with direct causal/strong longitudinal identification of marketing/market agility → firm financial performance, then test the full analytics → agility → performance mediation.
Automation separation: Deep Marketing-specific triggers remain disabled. A separate Central Automation System trigger is enabled; this does not by itself establish a Deep Marketing run, and no automation setting was changed in this work.
الهدف
بناء مستودع معرفة تشغيلي يحول الأدلة والمعلومات إلى معرفة مترابطة قابلة لإعادة الاستخدام والتطبيق، وليس مجرد أرشيف للأبحاث.
النموذج المعرفي
Source → Evidence → Insight → Pattern → Principle → Context → Hypothesis → Experiment → Result → Learning → Reuse
نموذج التشغيل الحاكم
Knowledge State → Discovery → Triage → Research → Validation → Conflict Check → Synthesis → Knowledge Commit → Quality Control → Gap Detection → Priority Queue → Persist State
Scheduled ≠ Continuous Process. التشغيل المجدول عبارة عن دورات منفصلة متكررة، والاستمرارية هي استمرارية حالة المعرفة وتحديد العمل التالي.
قواعد حاكمة
Fact ≠ Interpretation ≠ Hypothesis ≠ Result.
لا يُرفع مثال واحد إلى Pattern عام بلا تكرار كافٍ.
لا يتحول Pattern إلى Principle تلقائياً.
كل معرفة مهمة يجب أن يكون لها provenance إلى مصدر أو مجموعة مصادر.
لا نساوي بين كثرة الأدلة من الجهة نفسها وبين استقلالية الأدلة.
يجب تسجيل السياق والشروط والقيود قبل نقل المعرفة إلى تطبيق آخر.
المعرفة الجديدة الناتجة عن التجارب تعود إلى النظام ولا تبقى خارج قاعدة المعرفة.
مسار التنفيذ الحالي
المرجع التشغيلي التفصيلي هو Deep Marketing — Continuous Knowledge Operation Standard، أما تسلسل الأعمال البحثية فيُدار عبر KOS — Execution Pipeline.
كل دورة تُفحص من الحالة المحفوظة ثم تُنفّذ وحدة العمل ذات الأولوية الحقيقية، وتُسجّل نتيجتها قبل التوقف.
الحالة الحالية
Governance Reset: مكتمل.
Current Next Research Priority: Resume RSH-17 downstream causal validation. KNG-43 Evidence Links provenance reconciliation is now completed and verified; no further provenance repair is currently required.
Recently executed: RSH-16 causal calibration (pricing); RSH-17 causal calibration (marketing analytics); CKC-RSH2-010 cross-level evidence-strength integration; CKC-RSH2-011 final adversarial Stage Gate audit; CKC-RSH18-001 claim-level evidence register; CKC-37 reconciliation/no-change audit; CKC-RSH17-006 downstream market-agility performance evidence calibration; CKC-RSH17-007 full-mediation evidence calibration; RECON-RSH17-PROV-001 KNG-43 provenance reconciliation; CKC-RSH17-009 longitudinal competitive-advantage boundary test.
Current RSH state: RSH-15 = Needs Follow-up; RSH-16 = Needs Follow-up (causal calibration complete; transfer/long-run gaps open); RSH-17 = Needs Follow-up (causal calibration complete; agility mediation/transfer gaps open); RSH-18 = Needs Follow-up (claim-level register complete; independent replication/transfer testing open); RSH-3 = Analysis.
Knowledge status: KNG-43 = SYNTHESIZED; Conflict Status = NONE. Evidence strength is link/outcome/design-specific. ACTIVE promotion remains gated by causal evidence, tested application grounding, transfer validity, explicit scope limits, and verified provenance.
Operational state: RECON-RSH17-PROV-001 = COMPLETED / VERIFIED; KNG-43 Evidence Links currently contains 31 persisted evidence records in the reconstructed intended set, including EVD-RSH17-LONG-01. The longitudinal Saudi retail boundary test and the duplicate-source integrity audit are separate records; the duplicate is not independent evidence. Downstream findings remain heterogeneous and context-specific. No universal causal claim was promoted, and no current provenance defect is identified for the reconstructed KNG-43 evidence set.
Next Work: Continue RSH-17 with randomized or strong quasi-experimental identification of market-agility → financial-performance effects and direct testing of the full analytics → market agility → performance mediation. Also preserve the newly contextualized literature-scope mismatch (Vesterinen et al. vs Jung & Boo) as an interpretive issue, not as a substantive mechanism contradiction. RSH-18 remains Needs Follow-up for independent replication/transfer testing. Do not create duplicate research while existing open gaps cover the same question.
ملاحظة تشغيلية
هذا النظام مصمم ليخدم التسويق والمبيعات كحالة استخدام مهمة، لكنه ليس مقصوراً عليهما.
<a href="">📘 FINAL — Global Marketing Intelligence & Knowledge OS</a>
الغاية
هذا المشروع لم يُبن كبحث تسويقي ينتهي بتقرير؛ تم تحويله إلى Knowledge Operating System داخل Notion.
Current Operating Mode — Continuous Knowledge Operation
التشغيل المستمر مفعّل بمهمة مجدولة واحدة كل ساعة في المنطقة الزمنية Asia/Aden. كل دورة تقرأ حالة الـPipeline وResearch Queue، تنفذ وحدة عمل موثقة، تحدّث Notion وسجل التغييرات، ثم تنقل المهمة إلى التالية عند تحقق معايير الاكتمال والاعتماد. لا تُعاد المهام المكتملة ولا تُملأ الفجوات بالافتراض. المهام المحجوبة تبقى مفتوحة مع تسجيل سبب الحجب.
Current active research: RSH-3 — Map the scientific foundations of marketing. RSH-1 is now Integrated. RSH-12 and RSH-15 were advanced through multi-cycle batches and are currently Needs Follow-up for empirical/application validation. الغرض هو حفظ الأدلة، استخراج المعرفة، ربطها بالكيانات والحالات، ثم إعادة استخدامها في التحليل والتجارب والتطبيقات.
البنية
Source → Evidence → Insight → Pattern → Context → Hypothesis → Experiment → Result → Learning → Reuse
قواعد المعرفة
Fact ≠ Interpretation ≠ Hypothesis ≠ Result.
الأدلة لها provenance واضح.
كثرة الصفحات من المصدر نفسه لا تعني استقلالية الأدلة.
Pattern يحتاج تكرارًا؛ Principle يحتاج أدلة وسياقات أقوى.
Capability ≠ Effectiveness.
غياب الدليل في المصادر العامة = Evidence Gap، وليس إثباتًا لغياب الممارسة.
لا يتم نقل ممارسة شركة إلى شركة أخرى حرفيًا؛ تُنقل الفكرة بعد فحص السياق والشروط.
خط البحث الذي تم تحويله إلى معرفة
تم تحليل عينات عالمية ثم توسيعها عبر North America, Europe, Japan, Latin America, MENA، مع Country Intelligence أولية للسعودية والإمارات واليمن، ثم Deep Dives، ثم Content/SEO/Acquisition Intelligence، ثم ONYX/YemenSoft Benchmark.
الأنماط الرئيسية المكتشفة
Partner Marketing as an Operating System
Professional-Firm-First Distribution
Utility / Education Content as a Pre-Product Layer
Content-to-Intent Ladder
Low-Friction Product Evaluation
Partner Campaign Operations + Measurement
Regulatory / Infrastructure Context Shapes GTM
Global Core, Local Adapter
Trust + Utility + Product Evidence Form a Pre-Sale System
Customer Proof as a Bridge Between Education and Purchase
لم يُرقَّ أي من هذه الأنماط إلى Principle عام بصورة تلقائية. تبقى الحاجة قائمة إلى مزيد من evidence/experiments عندما يكون الادعاء سببيًا أو عندما نريد نقله إلى سياق جديد.
ONYX / YemenSoft Benchmark
النتيجة ليست score ولا ranking. الوضع الحالي:
هناك دليل عام على اتساع محفظة ONYX ERP وتنوعها.
توجد أخبار حالية عن شراكات تعليمية وعلاقات مؤسسية/مالية رقمية، وهي أدلة من YemenSoft نفسها وتُعامل على هذا الأساس.
تظهر صفحات حلول عامة ومسارات طلب عرض سعر.
تم توثيق طبقة توزيع/شراكة رسمية لـONYX: موقع ONYX يصف Ultimate Solutions كمؤسسة شقيقة لـYemenSoft وإحدى مجموعة شركاتها، ويعرض مسارًا رسميًا للوكلاء/التوزيع؛ كما توثق صفحة برنامج التوزيع شروط القبول، دراسة السوق، التدريب، عقد السنة الأولى التجريبي، خطة التسويق والقياس ربع السنوي، مدة تجهيز تصل إلى 60 يومًا، والدعم المستمر.
يظهر على موقع ONYX دليل عام واسع للموزعين المعتمدين والفروع/نقاط الخدمة في اليمن والسعودية وعدة أسواق دولية، لكن الدليل لا يثبت مستوى النشاط أو الإيراد لكل موزع.
ما زالت بيانات CRM، SEO/Search Console، campaign attribution، response time، partner activation، partner pipeline، conversion، win rate وCAC غير متاحة ضمن هذا المسار العام؛ لذلك لا يتم إصدار حكم على فعالية التسويق.
التجارب المقترحة
Problem-Led ONYX Content Pilot
ONYX Demo / Evaluation Friction Test
Professional-Firm Channel Discovery
Compliance / Infrastructure Content Wedge
كلها في حالة لم تبدأ. لا يوجد نجاح مفترض مسبقًا، وكل تجربة تتطلب baseline وCompany Context وبيانات داخلية قبل التنفيذ.
فجوات المعرفة ذات الأولوية
ربط المحتوى بالاكتساب والإيراد وليس بالزيارات فقط.
الانتقال من وصف برنامج الشركاء إلى قياس partner activation → lead → opportunity → pipeline → revenue → retention.
تحديد ما إذا كانت خطة التسويق والقياس المطلوبة من الوكيل تُنفذ فعليًا وبأي آلية متابعة.
تحديد مزيج Free Plan / Trial / Demo حسب تعقيد المنتج والـsegment.
تحديد مسارات ONYX الفعلية من Content → Lead → Quote → Sale.
معرفة ما إذا كان المحاسب/المستشار قناة مؤثرة فعليًا في شراء ONYX؛ توجد طبقة تواصل وشهادات مهنية، لكنها لا تثبت referral influence.
فهم أثر بنية المدفوعات والبنية التنظيمية على GTM حسب السوق.
الحالة التشغيلية للـPipeline
Stages 01–18: مكتملة على مستوى بنية البحث/المعرفة/Benchmark/Replication Framework والتقرير المرجعي.
بعد اكتمال Stage 18 انتقل التشغيل إلى Continuous Research Queue: RSH-1 أصبح Integrated، ثم عولجت دفعات متعددة في RSH-12 وRSH-15 مع إبقاء فجوات التطبيق والاختبار مفتوحة. الأولوية الحالية هي RSH-3 وفق الاعتماد والأولوية المسجلة.
التجارب الواقعية ونتائجها لم تبدأ بعد، ولا تُعامل المقترحات كنجاحات مثبتة.
حجم النظام الحالي
Sources: 45
Evidence: 57
Entities: 23
Cases: 32
Knowledge: 40
Experiments: 4
Applications: 2
Research Questions: 10
Execution Pipeline: 18
قاعدة الاستخدام المستقبلية
عند أي سؤال جديد، لا نبدأ من الصفر ولا نسأل الذكاء الاصطناعي عن أفكار عامة أولًا. المسار التشغيلي هو:
Company Context + Internal Data + Relevant Knowledge + Evidence → Analysis → Options/Hypotheses → Experiment → Result → Learning → Knowledge.
النتيجة
أصبح Notion الآن مرجعًا مركزيًا للمعرفة التي جُمعت في هذا المشروع، وليس مجرد مكان لتخزين تقارير البحث. ويمكن توسيعه إلى مجالات أخرى دون إعادة بناء النواة.
Current Conversation Audit Override — 2026-09-26
هذه الإضافة تتقدم على العبارات الأقدم التي تصف Scheduler كل ساعة بوصفه حالة حالية مؤكدة. في هذه المراجعة لم يتم إنشاء أو تعديل أتمتة خارجية، ولم تتم إعادة قراءة حالة Scheduler مباشرة؛ لذلك حالة الجدولة الخارجية الحالية UNVERIFIED. التفعيل المقصود هنا هو منهج تشغيل state-aware داخل المحادثة، وليس إنشاء أتمتة.
Current states: RSH-1 = Integrated; RSH-3 = Analysis; RSH-12 = Needs Follow-up; RSH-15 = Needs Follow-up; KNG-43 = SYNTHESIZED/bounded.
الحالة التشغيلية
Status: تأسيس النظام  
Current Phase: 0–3  
Operating Mode: State-Aware Continuous Knowledge Operation  
Automation Boundary: في هذه المراجعة لم يتم إنشاء أتمتة فعلية جديدة ولم تُغيّر إعدادات خارجية؛ التفعيل هنا منهجي/تشغيلي على مستوى هذه المحادثة فقط.
الغاية
بناء نظام معرفة واستخبارات تسويقية عميق، موثق، مترابط، قابل للتتبع والتطبيق والتحديث المستمر.
نطاق المعرفة
تغطي النواة جميع مستويات التسويق:
العلمي → النظري → الاستراتيجي → السلوكي → التشغيلي → المهني → التطبيقي → التحليلي → التقني
ولا يُعامل أي تخصص منفرد، مثل المحتوى أو Copywriting أو الإعلان أو التسويق الرقمي، باعتباره مركز النظام.
منهج التشغيل
Define → Map → Decompose → Question → Discover → Verify → Extract → Classify → Analyze → Compare → Infer → Derive → Connect → Apply → Measure → Review → Update → Repeat
المرحلة الحالية
Phase 0 — Define
تحديد الهدف: بناء مرجع تسويقي مركزي طويل الأمد.
Phase 1 — Marketing Master Map
تستخدم الأطر المهنية المرجعية كنقطة انطلاق، ثم تتوسع الخريطة بناءً على نتائج البحث.
إطار AMA الحالي يحدد ستة مجالات كفاءة رئيسية تشمل الأخلاقيات، القدرات الأساسية، الاستراتيجية والتخطيط، المحتوى والعلامة، القنوات والتقنية، والبيانات والتحليلات. كما يوضح أن المجالات تمثل دورة العمل التسويقية الكاملة مع وجود تداخل بينها.
إطار CIM يربط Direction + Capability + Professionalism + Impact ويقسم القدرات الأساسية إلى القيادة والإدارة، Digital Agility، تجربة العميل، تطوير المقترح، Commercial، Data & Insight، Brand & Reputation، وMarketing Communications.
Phase 2 — Domain Decomposition
تحويل الخريطة إلى:
Domain → Subdomain → Topic → Concept → Mechanism → Method → Tool → Application
Phase 3 — Source Architecture
فصل المصادر حسب:
Primary / Academic / Professional / Practitioner / Secondary
وتسجيل الموثوقية، النوع، السياق، حالة التحقق، وما الذي يدعمه كل مصدر.
قواعد الدليل
Fact ≠ Interpretation ≠ Hypothesis ≠ Result
Practitioner Experience ≠ General Law
Pattern ≠ Principle
وجود مصدر لا يعني صحة كل استنتاج منبثق عنه.
كثرة الصفحات من الجهة نفسها لا تعني استقلالية الأدلة.
أي تعميم يجب أن يمر عبر فحص السياق والقيود.
أي نتيجة سببية تحتاج دليلًا يسمح بالاستدلال السببي.
نقص الدليل يسجل باعتباره Evidence Gap ولا يملأ بالتخمين.
مصادر تأسيسية تم التحقق منها
AMA — Marketing Competency Model
CIM — Global Professional Marketing Framework
مسار العمل التالي
تثبيت Marketing Master Map.
بناء Research Question Map.
توسيع Source Universe.
بناء مكتبة الكتب والمراجع.
إنشاء سجلات الاستنتاجات والاستنباطات والتناقضات والفجوات.
تفعيل منهج Continuous Knowledge Operation عبر Trigger فعلي عند توفره، مع عدم الادعاء بوجود Scheduler ما لم يتم التحقق منه.
حالة الصفحة
هذه الصفحة تمثل طبقة تأسيسية وليست نهاية البحث. كل مجال لاحق يخضع للبحث والتحقق والتحليل والاستنتاج والاستنباط قبل اعتماده.
قواعد النظام الجديدة
External discovery layer — initial verified candidates
AMA Marketing Competency Model: professional competency benchmark.
CIM Global Professional Marketing Framework: professional capability benchmark.
AMA 2026 Future Trends in Marketing: foresight resource; use as emerging/current signal, not causal evidence.
AMA 2026 State of Marketing Careers: current skills/roles research; scope and geography must be preserved.
Google Skillshop: platform-specific training reference.
Meta Blueprint: platform-specific training reference.
Ehrenberg-Bass Institute: evidence-based marketing research layer.
WARC: marketing effectiveness and case-library layer; commercial and not equivalent to peer-reviewed evidence.
Initial operating rule
كل مورد خارجي يبدأ Candidate، ثم يمر عبر:
Verify → Classify → Evaluate → License Check → Compare → Integrate / Reference / Reject
ولا تدخل أي مادة جاهزة إلى Core Knowledge لمجرد أنها مشهورة أو منتشرة.
Current research snapshot — 2026-09-25
AMA’s current competency model and CIM’s current professional framework support using multiple independent professional frameworks as coverage benchmarks. AMA’s 2026 research adds a current skills/careers layer, while the 2026 Future Trends report belongs in the emerging/foresight layer.
هذه النتائج تأسيسية وليست حكمًا نهائيًا على taxonomy؛ المرحلة التالية يجب أن تختبرها مقابل الأدبيات الأكاديمية والكتب والمناهج ودراسات الحالة والتطبيقات.
AMA — Marketing Competency Model
CIM — Global Professional Marketing Framework
AMA — 2026 State of Marketing Careers
AMA — 2026 Future Trends in Marketing
Google Skillshop
Meta Blueprint
Ehrenberg-Bass Institute
WARC
Operating state
Phase: Foundation / Architecture  
Next Gate: Academic Source Architecture + 20+ Core Books + Research Question Map  
Continuous Mode: State-aware repeated operation; Scheduler status must be verified separately.
Unified Continuous Knowledge Operation — Operating Contract
Trigger model: USER-TRIGGERED / SCHEDULED / EVENT / RESUME بحسب المتاح فعليًا. لا يُدّعى تشغيل مستمر بلا Trigger.
Core loop: Knowledge State → Discovery → Triage → Research → Validation → Conflict Check → Synthesis → Knowledge Commit → Quality Control → Gap Detection → Priority Queue → Next Trigger.
Critical separation: Knowledge State ≠ Change Type ≠ Conflict Status.
Knowledge State: DISCOVERED · TRIAGED · RESEARCHING · VALIDATING · SYNTHESIZED · ACTIVE · CONTESTED · CONFLICTED · INSUFFICIENT_EVIDENCE · DUPLICATE · OUTDATED · SUPERSEDED · REJECTED
Change Type: CREATED · CONFIRMED · UPDATED · CORRECTED · CONTEXTUALIZED · DUPLICATED · SUPERSEDED · REJECTED
Conflict Status: NONE · OPEN · RESOLVED · PARTIALLY_RESOLVED
Cycle completion rule: لا تنتهي الدورة عند كتابة التقرير؛ تنتهي فقط بعد تحديث الحالة المعرفية، تسجيل ما تغير، تسجيل ما لم يُحسم، اكتشاف الفجوات، وتحديد العمل التالي.
Persistence rule: كل دورة تبدأ من آخر حالة مؤكدة وتنتهي بحالة أحدث قابلة للاستئناف. عند عدم وجود تغيير معرفي حقيقي يُسجل NO_CHANGE. عند تعذر التنفيذ يسجل BLOCKED.
24/7 operational truth: الاستمرارية هنا هي استمرارية الحالة والعمل التالي عبر Runs منفصلة. لا توجد حاليًا جدولة Deep Marketing فعّالة متحقق منها؛ وجود نموذج التشغيل أو سجل الدورات لا يساوي وجود Trigger فعّال.
Continuous Knowledge Cycle Log — CKC-001
Trigger_Type: MANUAL  
Cycle_Objective: اعتماد نموذج التشغيل الموحد في نص المستخدم وتجاوزه لأي Workflow سابق متعارض.
Knowledge_State_Before: Foundation / Architecture مع تشغيل مجدول مختلط بمصطلحات قديمة.
Research_Queue_Input: Marketing Master Map + Academic Source Architecture + Core Books + Research Question Map.
Validation_Decisions:
Scheduled Execution = repeated discrete runs، وليس Continuous Process.
لا يُدّعى تشغيل 24/7 بلا Trigger فعلي.
Knowledge State منفصل عن Change Type.
Conflict Status منفصل عن Knowledge State.
اكتمال مرحلة لا يوقف المنظومة؛ بل يحدد الانتقال إلى العمل التالي.
الدورة لا تكتمل بالتقرير؛ تكتمل بعد Commit + QC + Gap Detection + Next Work.
Knowledge_Changes:
CREATED: Unified operating contract + cycle-log structure.
UPDATED: Scheduled Continuous Knowledge Operation instructions.
CONTEXTUALIZED: 24/7 = recurring scheduled runs ضمن القدرات الفعلية، لا تنفيذ حرفيًا كل ثانية.
SUPERSEDED: التفسير السابق الذي يساوي بين الجدولة والاستمرارية الحية.
Conflicts:
OPEN: بعض قواعد البيانات القديمة ما زالت تستخدم حقول Status / Change Type بتسميات أقدم؛ لم تُحذف أو تُستبدل بصمت.
Knowledge_Gaps:
توحيد بقية بنية السجلات القديمة تدريجيًا دون فقد التاريخ.
تنفيذ بحث معرفي فعلي مستمر، لا الاكتفاء بصيانة منهج التشغيل.
Next_Research_Priorities:
تثبيت Marketing Master Map مقابل الأدبيات الأكاديمية.
بناء طبقة 20+ Core Books.
توسيع Research Question Map.
التحقق الدوري من المعرفة الزمنية والمرتبطة بالمنصات والأسواق.
Errors_or_Blockers: إنشاء قاعدة مستقلة لدورات التشغيل لم ينجح بأداة Notion في هذه الجولة؛ تم اعتماد سجل تشغيلي دائم داخل صفحة «التسويق العميق» بدلًا منه دون اختلاق بنية غير متاحة.
Human_Approval_Required: NO للبحث الروتيني؛ YES فقط لقرارات الحوكمة التي تتطلب سلطة بشرية صريحة.
Quality_Control_Result: PASS للمنهج التشغيلي؛ PARTIAL للترحيل البنيوي للسجلات القديمة.
Knowledge_State_After: ACTIVE  
Cycle_Status: PARTIAL  
Stop_Reason: انتهاء دورة إعادة الضبط فقط؛ التشغيل المجدول يبقى قائمًا لدورة لاحقة.  
Provenance_Recorded: YES
CANONICAL CONVERSATION DESIGNATION — 2026-09-30
Human governance decision: The user explicitly approved this conversation as the Canonical Conversation for the Deep Marketing project.
Scope of designation: This designation applies to the conversational/project context only. It does not mean this chat is identical to, or itself is, the scheduled Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger automation.
Archived peer conversations: The user states that the other Deep Marketing conversations have been archived. This statement is recorded as the user's current project decision; no independent inspection of those conversations was performed in this audit.
Operational rule: Notion Persistent State remains the operational source of truth. This conversation is the canonical conversational working context; durable knowledge, decisions, state, provenance, and cycle records must continue to be persisted and verified in Notion.
Deletion decision: No further action is taken on the archived conversations in this update.
MASTER MIGRATION RECORD — 2026-09-30
MASTER MIGRATION RECORD — Deep Marketing Conversation — 2026-09-30
Migration Status: PERSISTED / READ-BACK VERIFIED
Deletion Safety: NOT YET SAFE TO DELETE under the strict 100% transcript-exhaustiveness criterion; see MG-01..MG-03 in the Master Migration Record.
REASONING TRAIL MIGRATION — 2026-09-30
تم ترحيل Decision/Audit Rationale Trail القابل لإعادة الاستخدام من نطاق المحادثة إلى صفحة مستقلة، مع الحفاظ على حدود الإسناد وعدم نسبة السجلات اللاحقة إلى المحادثة دون دليل.
Reasoning Trail — Deep Marketing Conversation — 2026-09-30
Migration Status: COMPLETED / PERSISTED
Scope: reasoning rationale, decision logic, state-correction logic, provenance safeguards, automation-state verification logic, attribution boundaries, open-work continuity.
Important: هذا السجل لا يمثل transcript حرفيًا لسلسلة التفكير الخاصة؛ بل يمثل المبررات والروابط الاستدلالية التشغيلية القابلة للتوثيق وإعادة الفحص.
ATTRIBUTION RECONCILIATION — CKC-RSH17-010 — 2026-09-26
Verified state: KNG-43 Evidence Links contains 31 persisted references and includes EVD-RSH17-LONG-01; no prior references were dropped.
Audit finding: KNG-43 lists Last Changed By Cycle = CKC-RSH17-009, but the separately fetched CKC-RSH17-009 record is a NO_CHANGE duplicate-source audit. Therefore the persisted state is verified, while the exact execution attribution of the provenance write remains AMBIGUOUS due concurrent activity. No historical record is rewritten or deleted.
Operational consequence: treat KNG-43 provenance as reconciled/verified; do not infer that the user-triggered 009 audit performed the write.
Next work: RSH-17 direct causal/strong longitudinal financial-performance identification, then full causal mediation.
INTEGRITY DELTA — CKC-RSH17-009 — 2026-09-26
Duplicate detected: a second Source record for Alghamdi & Agag (2024) appeared in KOS — Sources and explicitly identifies itself as a duplicate of canonical SRC-RSH17-005.
Decision: the duplicate is not counted as an independent source/evidence base and was not deleted silently. Canonical provenance remains SRC-RSH17-005 → EVD-RSH17-LONG-01.
Operational interpretation: Deep Marketing-specific triggers are disabled. A separate Central Automation System trigger is enabled; its presence does not prove that Deep Marketing was executed by that trigger in this cycle, and no automation settings were changed.
Next work unchanged: direct causal/strong longitudinal evidence for marketing/market agility → firm financial performance, then full analytics → agility → performance mediation.
LATEST RESEARCH DELTA — CKC-RSH17-008 — 2026-09-26
New evidence persisted: peer-reviewed longitudinal evidence from Alghamdi & Agag (2024) uses two waves of Saudi Arabian retail-company data (T=677; T+1=569) and cross-lagged panel modeling.
Interpretation: the study materially strengthens temporal evidence around data-driven innovation capabilities → marketing agility → competitive advantage, but its downstream outcome is competitive advantage rather than direct firm financial performance. It therefore does not close the direct financial-performance causal gap and does not establish the complete analytics → agility → financial-performance mediation.
Research status: RSH-17 remains Needs Follow-up. No KNG-43 semantic promotion was performed.
Next valid unit: direct causal/quasi-experimental or strong longitudinal identification that measures market/marketing agility and firm financial performance in the same unit, followed by a causal mediation test.
LATEST RESEARCH DELTA — CKC-RSH17-006 — 2026-09-26
New evidence persisted: three independent peer-reviewed evidence records were added to KOS — Evidence for the downstream marketing agility → firm performance question.
Result: the relationship is empirically heterogeneous. UK evidence differentiates short- vs long-term profitability and reports customer-satisfaction mediation; a 2026 emerging-market SEM/fsQCA study associates agility components with performance; an East Java SME PLS-SEM study reports no significant direct marketing-agility effect on performance. These designs and contexts do not establish a universal causal effect.
Research status: RSH-17 remains Needs Follow-up. No KNG-43 promotion or semantic mutation was performed.
New contradiction/context record: the evidence is CONTEXTUALIZED, not treated as a strict logical contradiction.
Next valid unit: obtain direct causal or strong longitudinal/quasi-experimental evidence that measures market agility and downstream financial performance in the same unit; separately test the complete analytics → market agility → firm performance mediation.
Operational dependency: KNG-43 Evidence Links provenance reconciliation is closed and verified. No overwrite is currently pending. The next active dependency is RSH-17 downstream causal validation.
STRUCTURAL DATA-INTEGRITY FLAGS — 2026-09-26
Research Queue classification anomaly: توجد داخله حاليًا خانة باسم SRC-RSH17-004 — Data-driven agility UK retail experimental evidence مع Research ID = 19. الاسم والبنية يشيران إلى Source record لا إلى Research Item؛ لذلك تُعامل كسجل misclassified/legacy محتمل. لم تتم إزالته أو إعادة تصنيفه بصمت. الإجراء الصحيح عند فتح الترحيل هو IDENTIFY → MAP → VALIDATE → MIGRATE → VERIFY.
Contradiction Log schema boundary: قاعدة Contradiction Log تستخدم حقل Status بخيارات Open / Contextualized / Resolved / Needs Evidence. هذا الحقل لا يساوي Conflict Status التشغيلي المعتمد (NONE / OPEN / PARTIALLY_RESOLVED / RESOLVED) ولا يجوز استخدامه كبديل عنه. لا يوجد تعديل schema في هذه المراجعة.
CURRENT AUDIT OVERRIDE — 2026-09-26
Verified current scheduler state: Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger = DISABLED; Deep Marketing — Scheduled Knowledge Cycles = DISABLED. No active Deep Marketing-specific scheduled trigger is currently verified.
CKC-45 interpretation: CKC-45 exists as a later Cycle Log entry, but its operational fields are largely blank and Provenance Recorded = NO; therefore it is not evidence of a completed execution or successful Commit.
Current execution baseline: CKC-RSH17-008 = COMPLETED / VERIFIED added independent longitudinal Saudi retail evidence; CKC-RSH17-009 = COMPLETED / VERIFIED integrated that evidence into KNG-43 provenance. RSH-17 remains Needs Follow-up. KNG-43 remains SYNTHESIZED and its current 31-reference Evidence Links relation is verified.
Control rule: This audit does not re-enable or modify any automation. Historical records are preserved; current-state statements above govern operational interpretation until a later verified state supersedes them.
1. نطاق العمل
هذه الصفحة هي سجل مرجعي تحليلي للمحادثة الحالية الخاصة بمنظومة Deep Marketing — Continuous Knowledge Operation وما نتج عنها من قرارات وحالات وأدلة وتسويات تشغيلية.
حدود النطاق: لا تُضاف موضوعات خارج منظومة Deep Marketing/KOS إلا إذا كانت ضرورية مباشرة للتحقق من حالة أو قرار داخلها. المصادر الخارجية تستخدم للتحقق والسد المحدود للفجوات، ولا تغيّر نطاق العمل.
2. الهدف التشغيلي المستخلص
تحويل البحث التسويقي من تجميع معلومات إلى Knowledge Operating System يحافظ على:
الأدلة ومصدرها.
الادعاءات وحدودها.
الفصل بين Fact / Evidence / Interpretation / Hypothesis / Inference / Recommendation.
حالة المعرفة وتاريخ تغيرها.
السياق والمستوى والمنهج والنتيجة.
provenance من المصدر إلى المعرفة والتغيير.
فجوات قابلة للتحويل إلى Research Queue.
استمرارية قائمة على الحالة المحفوظة، لا على محادثة حية دائمة.
3. النموذج الحاكم
Knowledge State → Discovery → Triage → Research → Validation → Conflict Check → Synthesis → Knowledge Commit → Quality Control → Gap Detection → Priority Queue → Persist State → Next Trigger.
النظام المجدول عبارة عن دورات منفصلة؛ الاستمرارية المقصودة هي استمرارية الحالة + العمل التالي وليست عملية Live 24/7 داخل النموذج.
4. القواعد التشغيلية المستخلصة
لا ادعاء نهائيًا بلا تنفيذ/تحقق موثوق.
لا Knowledge Commit بلا Evidence.
لا تغيير نهائي في الحالة بلا Verified Persistence.
Research ≠ Source ≠ Evidence ≠ Knowledge Asset.
Search Result ≠ Knowledge Commit.
Knowledge State ≠ Change Type ≠ Conflict Status ≠ Commit Status.
SUPERSEDED ≠ DELETED.
عند UNKNOWN: RECONCILE FIRST.
عند فشل Commit: حفظ آخر حالة موثقة، تسجيل التغيير المعلّق، ثم reconciliation/retry/verify.
لا ترفع مثالًا واحدًا إلى Pattern عام دون تكرار مناسب.
لا تحول Pattern إلى Principle تلقائيًا.
لا تساوي كثرة الأدلة من الجهة نفسها مع استقلالية الأدلة.
يجب حفظ المستوى والسياق والشروط والقيود مع كل ادعاء مهم.
قوة الدليل تُسند إلى link/outcome/design وليس إلى mechanism chain ككتلة واحدة.
لا ACTIVE promotion للمعرفة المركبة لمجرد اكتمال بنيتها؛ الترقية تكون على مستوى الادعاء وبنطاقه وبشروط الأدلة والنقل.
5. الحالة التشغيلية الموثقة
KNG-43: SYNTHESIZED
Conflict Status: NONE
RSH-15: Needs Follow-up — فجوات السببية والتطبيق المختبر والنقل بين السياقات ما تزال مفتوحة.
RSH-16: Needs Follow-up — معايرة السببية اكتملت؛ بقيت فجوات الآثار طويلة الأجل والنقل والسياقات/المنتجات.
RSH-17: Needs Follow-up — توجد الآن أدلة عشوائية مستقلة على مستويين: تدخل تحليلات على أداء SMEs في eBay، وتدخل/قدرات تحليلية على market agility في UK retail SMEs، إضافة إلى RCT في رواندا يدعم أثر تدخل التحليلات على المبيعات والأرباح. لكن السلسلة الكاملة analytics → market agility → firm performance، والوساطة الكاملة والآثار طويلة الأجل، ما تزال غير مثبتة.
RSH-18: Needs Follow-up — سجل الأدلة على مستوى الادعاء مكتمل، بينما replication/transfer ما يزال مفتوحًا.
KOS Master Hub: تم تحديثه والتحقق من حفظ الحالة بعد التعديل.
6. القرارات المحسومة
6.1 فصل قوة الدليل
تم تثبيت قاعدة أن قوة الدليل تختلف حسب الرابط والنتيجة وتصميم الدراسة. هذه القاعدة موثقة في CHG-RSH2-010 وDER-RSH2-010.
6.2 معايرة RSH-16
الادعاء القابل للاستخدام ليس «السعر يرفع المبيعات» بصورة عامة. الأدلة تدعم بصورة أضيق آثارًا على التقييم/القيمة ومسارًا bounded من anchoring إلى expected-price latitude ثم purchase intention، مع بقاء realized sales/profit غير مثبتين على نحو عام.
6.3 معايرة RSH-17
تجربة eBay العشوائية تدعم أثر الوصول إلى analytics dashboard على الإيرادات/المبيعات في سياق eBay SMEs، مع دور مهم للمراقبة النشطة للأداء. كما أن دراسة UK retail SMEs المنشورة في 2026 توفر دعمًا تجريبيًا مباشرًا لرابط BDAC → market agility، بينما لا تزال market agility → firm performance والوساطة الكاملة بحاجة إلى دليل سببي مستقل. لذلك لا يجوز اختزال السلسلة في Claim سببي عام واحد.
6.4 Stage Gate
المعمارية الكلية KNG-43 بقيت SYNTHESIZED؛ لا توجد ترقية شاملة إلى ACTIVE.
6.5 Claim-Level Evidence Register
أصبح مستوى الادعاء هو وحدة التقييم المناسبة بدل تقييم architecture ككتلة واحدة.
7. مشكلات واختلالات اكتُشفت ومعالجتها
مشكلة A — عدم اتساق حالة RSH-16
كان سجل الطابور لا يعكس بصورة متزامنة إغلاق المعايرة السببية. المعالجة: reconciliation مع سجل الدورة وDerivation/Change records؛ تُعامل الحالة المعرفية وفق آخر حالة متحققة، مع إبقاء فجوات المتابعة مفتوحة.
مشكلة B — عدم اتساق RSH-17
كان Research Queue يعرض Needs Follow-up رغم وجود دورة COMPLETED/VERIFIED. التحليل: هذا ليس خطأً بالضرورة؛ Needs Follow-up تعكس فجوات النقل/الوساطة، بينما الدورة السابقة مكتملة. المعالجة: فصل حالة الدورة عن حالة البحث الجاري؛ لا تُحوّل Needs Follow-up إلى In Progress بلا سبب.
مشكلة C — RSH-18 ظهر In Progress بعد إتمام الدورة
CKC-RSH18-001 كان COMPLETED + VERIFIED بينما سجل Research Queue بقي In Progress. المعالجة المنفذة: تم تحديث RSH-18 إلى Needs Follow-up، وتحديد replication/transfer كعمل تالٍ.
مشكلة D — تداخل دورات التدقيق مع استمرار العمل
ظهر CKC-37 كـNO_CHANGE reconciliation بعد وجود CKC-RSH2-011، ثم استمر RSH-17 في دورات لاحقة ذات Delta معرفي حقيقي. المعالجة: لا تُعامل CKC-37 كإغلاق للمنظومة؛ بل كحالة reconciliation محلية، بينما استمرت دورات RSH-17 لأنها أضافت Evidence جديدًا.
8. ما تم التحقق منه خارجيًا
eBay — قوي سببيًا ضمن سياقه: صفحة INFORMS الرسمية توثق تجربة إدخال عشوائي لـeBay Seller Hub، وتذكر أثرًا متوسطه 3.6% على weekly sales، مع كون أكثر من ثلث أثر الأداة مرتبطًا بالمراقبة النشطة للأداء. لا يثبت ذلك أثرًا عالميًا لجميع الشركات أو المنصات. https://doi.org/10.1287/mnsc.2021.02026
الصين — دعم observational/SEM: دراسة Liang et al. في Journal of Business Research حللت مسحًا لـ238 شركة صينية ووجدت analytics → market agility → firm performance، مع معدلات تقوية/إضعاف مرتبطة بالتنسيق بين الأقسام واضطراب السوق وsuccess traps. هذا التصميم لا يساوي تجربة سببية للوساطة. https://doi.org/10.1016/j.jbusres.2021.11.061
رواندا — RCT حديث لكن ليس peer-reviewed confirmation في هذه الحالة: ورقة Anderson et al. على SSRN، آخر مراجعة لها 29 يونيو 2026، تستخدم RCT مع 550 شركة في رواندا وتبلغ عن آثار مالية إيجابية. تبقى في السجل كدليل transfer-context/working-paper، لا كبديل عن التحقق المنشور والمحكّم. https://ssrn.com/abstract=5310929
Brand loyalty — meta-analytic structural evidence: Desveaud, Mandler & Eisend (2024), Journal of Business Research، اعتمدت 1,261 effect sizes من 557 دراسة، ووجدت دعمًا لنموذج ذي مرحلتين تتوسط فيه brand experience وconsumer–brand bonding العلاقة نحو loyalty. هذا يدعم البنية/العلاقات التجميعية ولا يُعامل تلقائيًا كإثبات سببي لتدخل تسويقي بعينه. https://doi.org/10.1016/j.jbusres.2024.114589
UK retail SMEs — experimental evidence: Aldossary & Agag (2026), Journal of Retailing and Consumer Services 90, 104716، تختبر BDAC وmarket agility بتصميم تجريبي وتذكر causal evidence لرابط BDAC → market agility في دراسة 1 (N=248) ودراسة ثانية؛ ولا تثبت هذه الدراسة بمفردها المسار اللاحق إلى firm financial performance. https://doi.org/10.1016/j.jretconser.2025.104716
9. الافتراضات التي لا تزال افتراضات
صلاحية نقل أثر eBay إلى بيئات أخرى ليست مفترضة؛ تحتاج transfer evidence.
mediation عبر market agility غير مثبت تجريبيًا بما يكفي في الأدلة الحالية.
أي تطبيق تجاري مستنتج من الأدلة لا يُعتبر Experiment Result قبل اختباره.
كثرة المصادر لا تعني استقلاليتها.
وجود آلية تفسيرية قوية لا يعني ثبوت كل روابط السلسلة.
اكتمال Master Map لا يساوي maturity كافية لترقية كل claim إلى ACTIVE.
10. الفجوات الحالية ذات الأولوية
متابعة RSH-17: direct causal/longitudinal validation لرابط market/marketing agility → firm performance؛ تم إغلاق reconciliation لعلاقة KNG-43 Evidence Links والتحقق من حفظها.
Direct causal evidence لرابط market agility → firm performance والوساطة الكاملة analytics → market agility → firm performance.
Long-run outcomes وreplication عبر قطاعات وجغرافيات إضافية.
Formal risk-of-bias وidentification appraisal.
Application-grounded experiments للنتائج المشتقة.
منع إنشاء أبحاث مكررة عندما يغطي Research Item قائم الفجوة نفسها.
11. المخاطر التشغيلية
Mixed-design conflation: خطر ربط نتائج تجريبية وارتباطية داخل claim واحد.
Transfer overreach: نقل نتيجة من سياق ضيق إلى قاعدة عامة.
State drift: اختلاف حالة الطابور عن آخر دورة موثقة.
Provenance loss: تحديث معرفة دون الحفاظ على سلسلة Source → Evidence → Claim → Knowledge → Change → Cycle.
Duplicate research: إعادة فتح سؤال قائم دون Evidence جديد.
Automation illusion: الخلط بين Scheduled recurring runs وبين Live continuous execution.
12. سياسة الأتمتة ضمن نطاق المحادثة
لم يتم إنشاء أتمتة جديدة أو تغيير إعدادات خارجية بناءً على هذا التحليل.
الحالة الفعلية عند آخر فحص: Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger = DISABLED وDeep Marketing — Scheduled Knowledge Cycles = DISABLED؛ لذلك لا يوجد حاليًا Trigger مجدول فعّال لـDeep Marketing تم التحقق منه.
لا يجوز استنتاج سبب التعطيل من حالة الجدولة وحدها، ولا يجوز اعتبار وجود المرجع أو سجلات الدورات دليلًا على تشغيل مجدول فعلي. عند استئناف التشغيل بإذن صريح، يجب أولًا قراءة الحالة المحفوظة، وفحص التداخل، ثم تحديد Next Work، وتنفيذ دورة واحدة، والتحقق من Commit + Persistence قبل الادعاء بالنجاح.
13. الوضع المرجعي النهائي
هذه المحادثة لا تُعامل كأرشيف نصي؛ تُعامل كسياق تشغيلي يستند إلى Notion Persistent State كمرجع للحالة المحفوظة، مع استخدام المصادر الخارجية للتحقق فقط.
الحالة الأحدث التي أمكن التحقق منها:
KNG-43 = SYNTHESIZED
Conflict Status = NONE
RSH-15 = Needs Follow-up
RSH-16 = Needs Follow-up
RSH-17 = Needs Follow-up؛ الفجوة الحالية هي market agility → firm performance والوساطة الكاملة والنتائج طويلة الأجل/التكرار.
RSH-18 = Needs Follow-up؛ سجل الادعاءات مكتمل، replication/transfer مفتوح.
CKC-RSH17-004 = PARTIAL؛ سجل تاريخي قبل اكتمال reconciliation اللاحق؛ لا يمثل الحالة الحالية لـKNG-43 provenance.
CKC-RSH17-005 = PARTIAL / VERIFIED evidence persistence؛ أضيف دليل تجريبي مباشر على BDAC → market agility، دون تعديل KNG-43.
CKC-RSH17-006 = COMPLETED / VERIFIED؛ أُضيفت مقارنة مستقلة downstream لنتائج UK/Russia/East Java، وتمت contextualization دون ترقية KNG-43.
CKC-RSH17-007 = COMPLETED / VERIFIED؛ أضيف دعم SEM مستقل للوساطة الكاملة، لكن السببية بقيت غير مثبتة.
CKC-RSH17-008 = COMPLETED / VERIFIED؛ أضيف دليل طولي باستخدام cross-lagged panel model (CLPM) على DDIC → marketing agility → competitive advantage، مع بقاء direct financial-performance causality مفتوحًا.
CKC-RSH17-009 = COMPLETED / VERIFIED؛ أُدمج EVD-RSH17-LONG-01 في KNG-43 Evidence Links بعد إعادة القراءة، وأصبح إجمالي الروابط المحفوظة 31 دون تغيير Knowledge State.
Current Operational Gate: لا يوجد تشغيل مجدول فعّال لـDeep Marketing عند آخر فحص؛ لا تُنشأ دورة مجدولة جديدة لمجرد مرور الوقت.
Current Next Research Priority عند استئناف التشغيل: متابعة RSH-17 causal validation؛ الوحدة التالية هي randomized/strong quasi-experimental identification لرابط market agility → financial performance ثم اختبار full causal mediation analytics → market agility → performance.
KNG-43 لا يُرفع إلى ACTIVE قبل استيفاء شروط provenance والدليل والنقل والتطبيق والحدود.
Scheduler/Knowledge separation: تعطيل Trigger هو حالة تشغيلية مستقلة عن Knowledge State؛ KNG-43 يبقى SYNTHESIZED ولا يتغير بسبب حالة الجدولة.
ملاحظة تحقق: Query Data Source الشامل بلغ حد الاستخدام في جلسة سابقة، لذلك لا يُدّعى إجراء QC صفّي شامل. لكن CKC-RSH17-006 وKNG-43 provenance تم التحقق منهما مباشرة عبر صفحات Notion؛ وعليه فالحالة الحالية تعتمد على هذه القراءات المباشرة.
14. معيار الإغلاق لأي دورة لاحقة
لا تُعد الدورة مغلقة إلا بعد:
Research → Evidence validation → Existing-knowledge match → Change classification → Commit (إن لزم) → Verify → QC → Gap detection → Priority → Persist state → Verify persisted state.
أي حالة غير متحققة أو مجهولة تُعامل على أنها UNKNOWN/RECONCILING ولا تُعرض كإنجاز نهائي.
LATEST RESEARCH DELTA — CKC-RSH17-008 — 2026-09-26
New evidence persisted: Alghamdi & Agag (2024), Journal of Retailing and Consumer Services 76, 103547, two-wave longitudinal study of Saudi Arabian retail firms using cross-lagged panel analysis (T=677; T+1=569).
Finding: the study strengthens temporal evidence that marketing agility mediates the relationship between data-driven innovation capabilities and competitive advantage over time, with market turbulence as a moderator. Because the design is non-randomized and the outcome is competitive advantage rather than direct financial profitability, it does not establish direct causal market-agility → financial-performance effects.
Research status: RSH-17 remains Needs Follow-up. KNG-43 remains SYNTHESIZED; no Knowledge promotion or semantic rewrite was performed.
Next valid unit: locate or design randomized/strong quasi-experimental evidence that measures market agility and downstream financial performance in the same unit over time, and separately test the full analytics → market agility → performance mediation.
Provenance: SRC-RSH17-005 → EVD-RSH17-LONG-01 → CKC-RSH17-008 persisted and verified; CKC-RSH17-009 integrated EVD-RSH17-LONG-01 into KNG-43 Evidence Links and verified 31 refs.
MASTER MIGRATION LINK — 2026-09-30
MASTER MIGRATION RECORD — Deep Marketing Conversation — 2026-09-30
Purpose
هذا السجل ينقل مسار الاستدلال القابل لإعادة الاستخدام من المحادثة المرجعية إلى Notion، بهدف منع فقدان سياق القرارات عند أرشفة/حذف المحادثة. هذا السجل ليس نقلًا حرفيًا لسلسلة التفكير الخاصة، بل Decision/Audit Rationale Trail يقتصر على المبررات والروابط الاستدلالية التي يمكن توثيقها وإعادة فحصها.
Attribution Rule
لا تُنسب أي معلومة إلى هذه المحادثة لمجرد أنها موجودة الآن في Notion. النسبة هنا تقتصر على ما ظهر في سياق المحادثة الحالي. أما السجلات التي ظهرت لاحقًا في Notion دون إثبات من transcript فلا تُنسب تلقائيًا إلى هذه المحادثة.
Governing Reasoning Sequence
Understand → Analyze → Verify → Detect Gaps/Problems → Solve → Persist Knowledge/State → Define Next Work
وعند وجود حالة غير مؤكدة:
UNKNOWN → RECONCILE FIRST → VERIFY → RESUME / RETRY SAFELY
وعند فشل الكتابة أو الالتزام:
Preserve Last Verified State → Record Pending Change → Reconcile → Retry Safely → Verify
Core Reasoning Decisions
1. Layered Marketing Master Map
الاستدلال المعتمد: لا يكفي تنظيم المعرفة التسويقية كتقسيم مسطح للمجالات. يجب فصل السؤال/الظاهرة عن المجال، والنظرية/البناء، والآلية، والنتيجة، ومستوى التحليل، والمنهج/الدليل، والسياق، والتطبيق. النتيجة: KNG-43 = Marketing Master Map should be layered, not flat، مع اعتباره معمارية مشتقة لا Taxonomy عالميًا حصريًا.
2. Architecture ≠ Claim-Level Evidence
اكتملت بنية KNG-43 لا تعني أن كل روابطها مثبتة بالقوة نفسها. لذلك قُررت معايرة قوة الدليل على مستوى link / outcome / design / context، وعدم ترقية المعرفة المركبة إلى ACTIVE لمجرد اكتمال هيكلها.
3. RSH-17: تفكيك السلسلة السببية
تم رفض اختزال السلسلة:
Analytics → Market Agility → Firm Performance
إلى Claim سببي واحد.
الاستدلال: يمكن أن يكون الرابط upstream مدعومًا تجريبيًا، بينما يكون الرابط downstream أو الوساطة الكاملة أقل قوة أو observational فقط. لذلك تُقيّم كل حلقة على حدة.
4. RSH-17: الحالة لا تُغلق عند اكتمال دورة واحدة
تم الفصل بين:
Cycle Status و Research Item Status.
لذلك يمكن أن تكون دورة بحث محددة COMPLETED / VERIFIED بينما يبقى RSH-17 = Needs Follow-up بسبب فجوات السببية، والوساطة، والآثار طويلة الأجل، والنقل بين السياقات.
5. Evidence Heterogeneity ≠ Logical Contradiction
ظهور نتائج مختلفة حول market agility → firm performance لا يعني تلقائيًا تعارضًا منطقيًا. يجب أولًا فحص السياق، الفترة الزمنية، المجتمع/السوق، التعريفات، القياس، والمنهج. النتيجة المسجلة كانت contextualized heterogeneity بدل فرض تعارض جوهري غير مثبت.
6. No Universal Causal Generalization
الاستدلال: وجود RCT أو experimental evidence في سياق محدد لا يسمح وحده بتعميم سببي عالمي. لذلك بقيت نتائج eBay / UK / Rwanda وغيرها bounded by context، ولم تتحول إلى مبدأ تسويقي عام دون أدلة نقل وتكرار مناسبة.
7. Provenance Must Not Be Reconstructed by Guessing
عندما كانت عضوية علاقة KNG-43 Evidence Links غير مؤكدة، تم رفض overwrite التخميني. القاعدة: إذا تعذرت استعادة membership التاريخية بصورة موثوقة، فالحالة RECONCILING / OPEN إلى أن تتوفر أدلة كافية.
8. Automation State Must Be Tool-Verified
وجود Automation باسم Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger لا يثبت أنه فعال. الاستدلال التشغيلي اعتمد على فحص الحالة الفعلية للأداة. النتيجة التي ثبتت في مسار التدقيق: Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger = DISABLED و Deep Marketing — Scheduled Knowledge Cycles = DISABLED. لذلك لا يجوز وصف Deep Marketing بأنه Scheduled Active أو Live 24/7 دون تحقق جديد.
9. Scheduled ≠ Live Continuous
الاستمرارية المقصودة هي:
Persist State → Determine Next Work → Next Trigger → Resume
وليست إبقاء نموذج واحد قيد التشغيل المستمر. كل Trigger هو Run منفصل له بداية ونهاية وحالة محفوظة.
10. State / Change / Conflict / Commit Are Separate
تم تثبيت الفصل بين:
Knowledge State
Change Type
Conflict Status
Commit Status
الهدف منع أخطاء من نوع اعتبار COMPLETED دليلًا على إغلاق Research Item، أو اعتبار Contextualized في Contradiction Log مساويًا تلقائيًا لـ Conflict Status.
11. No Silent Deletion
SUPERSEDED ≠ DELETED. البيانات التاريخية أو المكررة لا تُحذف بصمت. الإجراء الآمن للسجلات غير المتوافقة هو:
IDENTIFY → MAP → VALIDATE → MIGRATE → VERIFY
Evidence Calibration Logic Preserved
النتيجة المعرفية الأهم في نهاية المسار:
توجد أدلة تجريبية مستقلة تدعم أجزاء مختلفة من المسار.
توجد أدلة observational / SEM تدعم علاقات وسيطة في بعض السياقات.
لا يوجد في هذا السجل ما يبرر إعلان الوساطة الكاملة Analytics → Market Agility → Firm Performance كعلاقة سببية عامة.
لذلك بقي RSH-17 = Needs Follow-up و KNG-43 = SYNTHESIZED.
Operational Integrity Findings
تم رصد State Drift بين بعض النصوص التاريخية والحالة الفعلية للأتمتة.
تم الحفاظ على الفصل بين historical state و verified current state.
تم رصد خطر duplicate research/source records، مع قاعدة عدم اعتبار النسخة المكررة دليلًا مستقلًا دون Entity/Source Resolution.
تم رصد خطر provenance loss عند الكتابة غير الآمنة.
تم رصد خطر mixed-design conflation عند دمج نتائج تجريبية وارتباطية في Claim واحد.
تم رصد خطر transfer overreach عند نقل النتائج من سياق محدود إلى قاعدة عامة.
Current Research Continuity
الحالة التي ينبغي أن يبدأ منها العمل التالي هي:
KNG-43 = SYNTHESIZED
Conflict Status = NONE
RSH-15 = Needs Follow-up
RSH-16 = Needs Follow-up
RSH-17 = Needs Follow-up
RSH-18 = Needs Follow-up
ولـRSH-17:
Next Work: direct causal / strong quasi-experimental / strong longitudinal identification of market agility → firm financial performance, ثم اختبار الوساطة الكاملة analytics → market agility → financial performance.
Attribution Boundary
المعرفات مثل KNG-43 و RSH-15..18 ظهرت ضمن سياق المحادثة، لكن هذا لا يعني أن كل Cycle IDs اللاحقة الموجودة حاليًا في Notion أُنشئت داخل هذه المحادثة. لا تُنسب السجلات اللاحقة مثل CKC-RSH17-008/009/010 إلى هذه المحادثة دون دليل مستقل على مصدرها.
Deletion Safety
قبل حذف المحادثة الأصلية، يجب الاحتفاظ بهذا السجل مع:
Decision rationale
State corrections
Attribution boundaries
Open gaps / Next Work
Provenance/reconciliation rationale
Automation-state verification logic
هذا السجل مقصود كبديل دائم لسياق الاستدلال القابل لإعادة الاستخدام، وليس كبديل عن السجل الأصلي إذا كانت هناك حاجة إلى مراجعة المحادثة نفسها.
Source
مرجع نطاق العمل — Deep Marketing Conversation — 2026-09-26
MIGRATION SCOPE
Source: هذه المحادثة الحالية فقط، بما في ذلك ما ظهر في سياقها حتى لحظة تنفيذ هذا الترحيل.
Purpose: حفظ كل المعرفة والقرارات والحالات والتصحيحات والقواعد والمنهجيات والنتائج والفجوات والتبعيات والمنطق التشغيلي القابل لإعادة الاستخدام قبل حذف المحادثة.
Authority rule: لا يُفترض أن هذه المحادثة هي المحادثة الرسمية أو الأفضل أو الوحيدة. هذا السجل يثبت فقط ما أمكن استخراجه من نطاق المحادثة الحالية.
Critical attribution rule: وجود معلومة في Notion أو الذاكرة أو Automation لا يثبت أنها نشأت في هذه المحادثة. ما لم يثبت المصدر داخل نطاق المحادثة، يُصنّف Unknown Attribution / Historical / Later-added بحسب الدليل.
Deletion principle: هذا السجل لا يعلن أمان حذف المحادثة إلا بعد التحقق من اكتمال الترحيل وعدم وجود Migration Gap جوهري غير موثق.
1. IDENTITY
Conversation title: غير ظاهر في السياق المتاح؛ لا أعرف الاسم الفعلي الظاهر في واجهة ChatGPT.
Actual subject: تدقيق وتشغيل وحوكمة منظومة Deep Marketing — Continuous Knowledge Operation، مع إدارة المعرفة والأبحاث والحالات والـprovenance والـResearch Queue، والتركيز البحثي في الجزء الأخير على KNG-43 و RSH-17، إضافة إلى تدقيق الحالة التشغيلية للـDeep Marketing triggers.
Role in Deep Marketing: مسار مرجعي/تشغيلي/بحثي/تدقيقي داخل المنظومة، وليس مجرد بحث موضوعي عن التسويق.
Classification: Extension / Operational & Audit Continuity. لا يوجد دليل كافٍ لتصنيفها Duplicate على مستوى المشروع لأن المحادثات الأخرى غير متاحة ضمن هذا التدقيق.
2. CONVERSATION-LIFECYCLE EVENTS
Before / Pre-existing
ظهرت في السياق معرفات وحالات وأطر حوكمة كانت موجودة قبل الجزء الأخير من المحادثة، ومنها KNG-43 وRSH-15..18 وبعض بنية KOS. لا يجوز اعتبارها كلها ناتجة من هذه المحادثة.
During this conversation
جرى تدقيق الوضع المرجعي لمنظومة Deep Marketing.
جرى التحقق من أن Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger = DISABLED وأن Deep Marketing — Scheduled Knowledge Cycles = DISABLED.
جرى تثبيت أن وجود Trigger أو اسمه لا يكفي لإثبات نشاطه.
جرى تحليل KNG-43 وRSH-17 على مستوى المعرفة والبحث والـprovenance.
جرى تعزيز معايرة RSH-17 بأدلة مستقلة ومختلفة التصميم.
جرى الفصل بين حالة الدورة وحالة Research Item.
جرى تسجيل مخاطر State Drift وMixed-Design Conflation وTransfer Overreach وProvenance Loss وDuplicate Research.
جرى تنفيذ ترحيل Decision/Audit Rationale Trail إلى صفحة مستقلة.
في نهاية هذه العملية جرى إنشاء هذا Master Migration Record والتحقق من حفظه.
Later / External-to-conversation attribution boundary
أي سجلات Notion لاحقة أو تغييرات ظهرت بعد أحداث المحادثة لا تُنسب إليها تلقائيًا. مثال صريح: سجلات CKC اللاحقة التي لم يثبت transcript الحالي أنها أُنشئت داخل هذه المحادثة.
3. KEY REQUIREMENTS AND GOVERNANCE EXTRACTED
Conversation = Scope of Audit.
لا يُستخدم Notion/Memory كدليل على origin.
No Verified Execution = No Claim.
No Evidence = No Knowledge Commit.
No Verified Persistence = No Final State Change.
Research ≠ Source ≠ Evidence ≠ Knowledge Asset.
Search Result ≠ Knowledge Commit.
Knowledge State ≠ Change Type ≠ Conflict Status ≠ Commit Status.
SUPERSEDED ≠ DELETED.
عند UNKNOWN → RECONCILE FIRST.
لا تُستخدم الكثرة أو الحداثة وحدهما لحسم التعارض.
لا يُحوّل مثال واحد إلى Pattern عام دون تكرار كافٍ.
لا يتحول Pattern تلقائيًا إلى Principle.
يجب حفظ السياق والشروط والقيود مع الادعاء.
قوة الدليل تتبع link / outcome / design / context.
لا تُرقى المعرفة المركبة إلى ACTIVE لمجرد اكتمال بنيتها.
كل دورة يجب أن تنتهي بحالة محفوظة وNext Work أو سبب موثق لعدم القدرة على تحديده.
Scheduled ≠ Continuous Process.
الاستمرارية = Persist State → Determine Next Work → Next Trigger → Resume.
لا تغييرات تشغيلية أو حذف أو تمكين/تعطيل أثناء الترحيل إلا إذا كانت مطلوبة مباشرة؛ هذا الترحيل نفسه لم يغيّر إعدادات Automation.
4. DECISIONS
D-01 — Layered Marketing Master Map
Decision: تنظيم Marketing Master Map كمعمارية متعددة الطبقات بدل taxonomy مسطح واحد.
Rationale: المجالات والنظريات والآليات والنتائج والمستويات والمناهج والسياقات والتطبيقات ليست أبعادًا قابلة للطي في محور واحد دون فقدان المعنى.
Status: Operational / reflected in KNG-43.
Knowledge ID: KNG-43.
D-02 — Claim-Level Evidence
Decision: تقييم قوة الأدلة على مستوى الرابط/النتيجة/التصميم/السياق.
Rationale: اكتمال Architecture لا يعني تساوي القوة الإثباتية لكل روابطها.
Consequence: لا ACTIVE promotion شاملة لـKNG-43.
D-03 — RSH-17 Causal Decomposition
Decision: عدم اختزال Analytics → Market Agility → Firm Performance إلى claim سببي عالمي واحد.
Rationale: الروابط المختلفة مدعومة بتصاميم وأحجام أدلة مختلفة، وقد يكون downstream observational أو heterogeneous.
Status: RSH-17 = Needs Follow-up.
D-04 — Cycle Status vs Research Status
Decision: عدم تفسير COMPLETED/VERIFIED لدورة معينة باعتباره إغلاقًا لـResearch Item.
Consequence: يمكن أن تبقى RSH-17 = Needs Follow-up بعد اكتمال دورات بحثية فرعية.
D-05 — Heterogeneity Classification
Decision: اختلاف نتائج market agility → firm performance يُعامل أولًا كـcontext/time/design heterogeneity لا كتناقض منطقي تلقائي.
Consequence: فحص السياق والمنهج والقياس والفترة الزمنية قبل إعلان Conflict.
D-06 — No Universal Causal Generalization
Decision: تبقى النتائج التجريبية bounded by context.
Consequence: لا تحويل لنتائج eBay/UK/Rwanda إلى universal principle دون transfer/replication.
D-07 — Provenance Reconciliation
Decision: عدم إعادة بناء KNG-43 Evidence Links بالتخمين عند عدم وضوح membership التاريخية.
Rule: preserve last verified state + reconcile + verify.
D-08 — Automation Verification
Decision: الحالة التشغيلية للـCanonical Trigger تُحسم بالفحص الفعلي للأداة وليس بالاسم أو نص تاريخي.
Verified during this migration: Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger = DISABLED; Deep Marketing — Scheduled Knowledge Cycles = DISABLED.
5. CORRECTIONS
C-01 — Scheduler State Drift
Original/older assertion: وجود نص قديم يفيد بأن Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger فعال.
Verification: actual scheduler inspection.
Correction: trigger disabled; scheduled Deep Marketing execution inactive.
Impact: لا يجوز وصف المنظومة بأنها scheduled-active أو live 24/7 حاليًا.
C-02 — Research/Cycle State Confusion
Issue: احتمال الخلط بين اكتمال دورة بحث وحالة Research Item.
Correction: الفصل الصريح بين Cycle Status وResearch Status.
C-03 — Causal Conflation
Issue: خطر تجميع experimental وobservational evidence داخل claim سببي واحد.
Correction: claim-level/link-level calibration.
C-04 — Provenance Safety
Issue: احتمال فقدان/overwrite لعلاقة Evidence Links عند إعادة البناء غير الآمن.
Correction: عدم التخمين؛ reconcile/verify أولًا.
6. KNOWLEDGE AND EVIDENCE STATUS
KNG-43
Knowledge: Marketing Master Map should be layered, not flat.
State: SYNTHESIZED.
Conflict Status: NONE.
Interpretive boundary: derived architecture, not a universal canonical flat taxonomy.
Promotion: no global ACTIVE promotion established in this conversation.
RSH-15
State: Needs Follow-up.
Known unresolved area: causal/application/transfer gaps remain as previously represented in the conversation.
RSH-16
State: Needs Follow-up.
Known calibration: causal calibration completed; transfer/long-run gaps remain.
Boundary: pricing effects must not be generalized to realized sales/profit without adequate causal evidence.
RSH-17
State: Needs Follow-up.
Core question: whether/when market agility acts as a causal mediator between analytics/BDAC and financial performance.
Evidence calibration preserved:
bounded experimental evidence for analytics → performance in specific contexts;
experimental evidence for BDAC → market agility in UK retail SMEs;
observational/SEM evidence for mediated structures;
longitudinal evidence around data-driven capabilities → marketing agility → competitive advantage;
downstream market-agility/performance evidence is heterogeneous across contexts/time horizons.
Current unresolved: direct causal/strong quasi-experimental/strong longitudinal identification of market agility → financial performance and direct full mediation testing.
RSH-18
State: Needs Follow-up.
Known gap: independent replication/transfer testing.
7. RESEARCH IDs APPEARING IN SCOPE
RSH-15, RSH-16, RSH-17, RSH-18
These IDs clearly occur in the conversation context, but their original creation dates are not all attributable to this conversation.
8. KNOWLEDGE / CHANGE / DERIVATION / CYCLE ATTRIBUTION
Knowledge ID clearly in scope: KNG-43.
Change / Derivation / Inference IDs: multiple historical identifiers appear in the context, but creation-attribution must not be assumed unless the transcript explicitly establishes it.
Cycle IDs: several historical cycles were discussed. The conversation context clearly contains research/audit cycles around RSH-17, including CKC-RSH17-006 and CKC-RSH17-007 in the later work. Later CKC records are not attributed to this conversation solely because they now exist in Notion.
Canonical attribution rule: when uncertain, classify as Unknown Attribution rather than fabricate provenance.
9. REASONING / DECISION TRAIL
تم حفظ المسار الاستدلالي القابل لإعادة الاستخدام في:
Reasoning Trail — Deep Marketing Conversation — 2026-09-30
Its logic includes:
Understand → Analyze → Verify → Detect Gaps/Problems → Solve → Persist → Define Next Work
and:
UNKNOWN → RECONCILE FIRST → VERIFY → RESUME / RETRY SAFELY
and:
Failure → Preserve Last Verified State → Record Pending Change → Reconcile → Retry → Verify
10. PROVENANCE MODEL
Required chain:
Source → Evidence → Claim → Knowledge → Change → Cycle
Verified principle:
a search result is not a knowledge commit;
source alone is insufficient without valid evidence;
causal strength attaches to bounded link/outcome/design/context;
missing relation membership is not reconstructed by guessing.
11. CONFLICT / INTEGRITY FINDINGS
Detected risk classes:
State Drift.
Mixed-Design Conflation.
Transfer Overreach.
Provenance Loss.
Duplicate Research / Duplicate Source risk.
Schema boundary between Contradiction Log Status and global Conflict Status.
Attribution ambiguity for later Notion records.
No unresolved logical contradiction is established for KNG-43 itself from this conversation.
12. OPERATIONAL STATE SNAPSHOT
Verified during migration:
Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger = DISABLED.
Deep Marketing — Scheduled Knowledge Cycles = DISABLED.
No Deep Marketing-specific scheduled execution is currently active based on the inspected automation state.
Knowledge state represented at end of this conversation:
KNG-43 = SYNTHESIZED.
RSH-15 = Needs Follow-up.
RSH-16 = Needs Follow-up.
RSH-17 = Needs Follow-up.
RSH-18 = Needs Follow-up.
Next research unit for RSH-17:
Direct causal / strong quasi-experimental / strong longitudinal identification of market agility → firm financial performance, followed by direct testing of full analytics → market agility → financial performance mediation.
13. OPEN GAPS
Direct causal identification of market agility → financial performance.
Full causal mediation test for analytics → market agility → financial performance.
Long-run outcomes.
Replication across sectors/geographies.
Transfer validity.
Formal risk-of-bias / identification appraisal.
Any future provenance attribution that cannot be established from durable records.
14. MIGRATION INVENTORY
15. MIGRATION GAPS / UNRESOLVED ITEMS
MG-01 — Full transcript-to-record exhaustiveness
What is missing: لا أملك نسخة مستقلة قابلة للبحث من كامل transcript التاريخي خارج سياق المحادثة المتاح حاليًا.
Why: حدود السياق المتاح لا تضمن استرجاع كل رسالة قديمة خارج ما هو ظاهر/محفوظ في هذا السياق.
Risk: احتمال وجود تفاصيل دقيقة جدًا غير ظاهرة في السجل الحالي.
Recovery: الاحتفاظ بالمحادثة حتى يتم توفير transcript الكامل، أو إجراء مقارنة مستقلة من مصدر المحادثات قبل الحذف.
Deletion safety: هذا Gap وحده يمنع القول بـSAFE TO DELETE إذا كان المطلوب "اكتمال مطلق" حرفيًا.
MG-02 — Conversation title
Missing: الاسم الفعلي الظاهر في واجهة ChatGPT.
Status: UNKNOWN.
Risk: منخفض على المعرفة، مهم للهوية والأرشفة.
Recovery: قراءة عنوان المحادثة من واجهة ChatGPT أو سجل تصدير المحادثات.
Deletion safety: يمكن تخزين معرّف/رابط خارجي إن توفر؛ حاليًا غير متاح.
MG-03 — Exact authorship of historical Cycle IDs
Missing: attribution مؤكد لبعض Cycle IDs القديمة/اللاحقة.
Status: Attribution-bounded.
Risk: تزوير provenance إذا نُسبت إلى هذه المحادثة دون دليل.
Recovery: ربط كل Cycle بالتاريخ/الرسالة/سجل Notion الأصلي إن توفر.
Deletion safety: لا يمنع حذف المعرفة نفسها، لكنه يمنع الادعاء بأن هذه المحادثة كانت مصدر كل تلك الدورات.
16. DUPLICATE / LEGACY POLICY
لا حذف أثناء الترحيل.
لأي سجل مشكوك في كونه duplicate/misclassified:
IDENTIFY → MAP → VALIDATE → MIGRATE → VERIFY
ولا يُحول التاريخ إلى حذف صامت.
17. DELETION-SAFETY ASSESSMENT
Current classification: NOT YET SAFE TO DELETE
Direct reason: الترحيل الدائم للمعرفة والقرارات والحالة والـReasoning Trail تم، لكن لا يمكن الادعاء باكتمال مطلق للمحادثة لأن MG-01 يثبت أن التحقق الشامل من كامل transcript التاريخي غير ممكن من السياق المتاح وحده، ولأن اسم المحادثة نفسه غير مثبت، ولأن بعض Cycle-attribution التاريخية لا يمكن حسمها.
هذا لا يعني أن المعرفة الجوهرية غير محفوظة؛ يعني فقط أن شرط "الترحيل الكامل بدقة متناهية" لم يُثبت حرفيًا بنسبة 100%.
18. PERMANENT REFERENCES
Reasoning Trail — Deep Marketing Conversation — 2026-09-30
Reasoning Trail — Deep Marketing Conversation — 2026-09-30
مرجع نطاق العمل — Deep Marketing Conversation — 2026-09-26
Deep Marketing — Continuous Knowledge Operation Standard
19. FINAL MIGRATION RULE
لا تستخدم هذا السجل لإثبات أن هذه المحادثة هي Canonical Conversation على مستوى المشروع.
استخدمه لإثبات أن:
هذه المحادثة خضعت لترحيل منظم.
المعرفة الجوهرية والقرارات والحالات والفجوات والمنطق التشغيلي القابل لإعادة الاستخدام تم حفظها.
حدود الإسناد وعدم اليقين بقيت ظاهرة.
أي حذف لاحق يجب أن يستند إلى مقارنة هذه الصفحة مع المحادثات الأخرى، وليس إلى افتراض أن هذا السجل يجعل المقارنة غير ضرورية.
20. CURRENT MIGRATION EXECUTION — 2026-09-30
Trigger: USER-TRIGGERED FULL CONVERSATION MIGRATION & LOSSLESS ARCHIVAL.
Conversation-local chronological record
طلب المستخدم تدقيق/عصف ذهني لمشروع Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger لمعرفة ما حدث، وما تم حفظه في الذاكرة والتعليمات، وما يحتاج إلى استكمال.
جرى تحديد أن المهمة الصحيحة هي Conversation State Reconstruction & Governance Audit وليست مجرد تلخيص.
جرى التفريق بين Conversation / Memory / Instructions / Notion Persistent State / Automation State.
سأل المستخدم هل هذه المحادثة هي المحادثة الرسمية؛ النتيجة: لا يمكن إثبات اسم Chat الفعلي من السياق المتاح، ولا تُثبت الرسمية بمجرد الاسم أو الموضوع.
طلب المستخدم اعتماد محادثة واحدة فقط من ثلاث محادثات؛ تم وضع بروتوكول موحد لتقييم كل مرشح محليًا دون ترتيب مسبق.
عند تقييم هذه المحادثة محليًا، صُنّفت NOT SUITABLE FOR CANONICAL لأن وظيفتها الأساسية في هذا السياق هي Governance/Audit/Canonicalization، لا كونها السجل التأسيسي الأصلي للمشروع.
طلب المستخدم Prompt للترحيل قبل الحذف؛ تم بناء مواصفة FULL CONVERSATION MIGRATION & LOSSLESS ARCHIVAL تمنع فقدان القرارات والقواعد والحالة والتصحيحات وتفرض Read-back Verification.
نفّذ المستخدم تلك المواصفة في هذه المحادثة وطلب الترحيل الفعلي.
New migration findings from the present execution
تم البحث أولًا عن سجل ترحيل موجود، وعُثر على MASTER MIGRATION RECORD — Deep Marketing Conversation — 2026-09-30، لذلك لم يُنشأ سجل ترحيل مكرر.
السجل الموجود يحتوي بالفعل على Decision/Audit rationale، والحالة الحالية، والفجوات، وحدود الإسناد، وحالة الحذف.
تم فحص Reasoning Trail — Deep Marketing Conversation — 2026-09-30 المرتبط بالسجل الرئيسي.
لم يتم إنشاء Automation جديدة ولم يتم تمكين/تعطيل أي Automation ضمن هذه العملية.
لم يتم الادعاء بتحديث الذاكرة الدائمة؛ لا توجد آلية ذاكرة مباشرة متاحة ضمن هذه العملية.
تم إجراء Read-back للسجل الرئيسي قبل هذا الإضافات، وستُجرى إعادة قراءة بعد الكتابة للتحقق من Persistence.
Additional durable rules extracted from this conversation
Audit → Extract → Persist → Verify → Delete هو ترتيب الحذف الآمن.
لا تُستخدم تسمية Chat كدليل على هوية الدور التشغيلي.
لا يجوز تسمية محادثة بأنها Canonical إلا بعد مقارنتها محليًا مع المرشحين الآخرين مع الحفاظ على معايير موحدة.
لا يجوز نسبة معلومة إلى Conversation-Originated لمجرد وجودها في Notion أو Memory.
عند عدم القدرة على إثبات سجل تاريخي كامل، استخدم NOT FOUND IN AVAILABLE STATE / UNKNOWN ATTRIBUTION بدل الجزم بعدم وجوده.
يجب فصل Canonical Conversation عن Canonical Knowledge Source وعن Canonical Automation Trigger؛ هذه ثلاثة أدوار مختلفة.
Prompt artifacts with future reuse value
المواصفة التي طُلبت واعتمدت في هذه المحادثة لترحيل المحادثات قبل الحذف تعتمد على:
FULL CONVERSATION MIGRATION & LOSSLESS ARCHIVAL
ومكوناتها الأساسية:
Extraction → Attribution → Classification → Persistence → Read-back Verification → Loss Audit → Deletion Safety.
المبدأ الحاكم:
No Verified Persistence → No Migration Success.
Current deletion assessment
Status = NOT YET SAFE TO DELETE
السبب ليس ثبوت فقدان المعرفة الجوهرية؛ بل لأن شرط الترحيل الحرفي الكامل لكل تاريخ المحادثة خارج السياق المتاح لا يمكن إثباته بنسبة 100%، ولأن Chat title نفسه غير متاح للتحقق المباشر من داخل هذا المسار.
المعرفة والقرارات والقواعد والفجوات والمنطق التشغيلي القابل لإعادة الاستخدام محفوظة في سجل الترحيل ومرجع Reasoning Trail، لكن ذلك لا يساوي إثباتًا بأن كل رسالة تاريخية حرفيًا قد تم نسخها.
Final loss boundary
إذا كان الحذف سيحدث الآن، فإن ما لا يزال غير قابل للإثبات هو:
الاسم الظاهر في واجهة ChatGPT.
أي رسائل/تفاصيل قديمة خارج السياق المتاح حاليًا.
الإسناد الدقيق لبعض السجلات التاريخية إلى هذه المحادثة.
أما العناصر الجوهرية التي ظهرت في هذه المحادثة — الحوكمة، قواعد الفصل بين طبقات الحالة، بروتوكول اختيار الـCanonical، بروتوكول الترحيل، معايير الحذف الآمن، ومبررات تصنيف هذه المحادثة — فقد تم حفظها في هذا السجل.
Verification boundary
لا يُفهم UNVERIFIED في Native Notion Verification Metadata على أنه فشل في الحفظ. هنا المقصود هو أن واجهة Notion لموسم التحقق الرسمي للصفحة لا تساوي إثبات Read-back التشغيلي؛ إثبات Persistence يعتمد على إعادة قراءة المحتوى ومقارنته.
Next action
قبل الحذف، إن كان المطلوب شرط LOSSLESS 100% حرفيًا، يجب توفير/التحقق من transcript الكامل لهذه المحادثة وعنوانها الفعلي. غير ذلك، فالسجل الدائم الحالي يمثل Loss-Minimized Verified Migration وليس نسخة حرفية كاملة لكل الرسائل.
21. FINAL LOSS AUDIT — 2026-09-30
Transcript verification
Accessible conversation transcript: reviewed in full for all user/assistant messages available in the current ChatGPT context.
Platform export completeness: NOT VERIFIED. There is no independent ChatGPT transcript export available to this audit, so absolute 100% archival completeness outside the visible/current context cannot be claimed.
Conversation title in ChatGPT UI: UNKNOWN / NOT VISIBLE to this execution environment. No title was invented.
Cross-check against persistent archive
The final review confirms that the migration record already contains the substantive conversation-local material:
audit/canonicalization purpose;
decisions and governance rules;
Memory / Instructions / Notion / Automation separation;
canonical-candidate evaluation logic;
migration-before-delete protocol;
attribution boundaries;
unresolved gaps and deletion-safety rules.
The separate Reasoning Trail is also present and linked from the Master Migration Record.
Automation verification
A direct scheduler inspection was performed during this final audit. The named Deep Marketing automations remain:
Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger = DISABLED
Deep Marketing — Scheduled Knowledge Cycles = DISABLED
No Automation was modified by this final audit.
Final loss categories
VERIFIED PRESERVED: substantive decisions, rules, corrections, governance logic, migration protocol, attribution constraints, current/open work represented in the accessible transcript.
HISTORICAL PRESERVED: historical references and bounded state distinctions represented in the migration archive.
UNKNOWN / NOT VERIFIED: Chat title as displayed in the UI; any transcript content outside the accessible/current context; exact origin of any historical record not explicitly attributed.
NOT MATERIAL TO KNOWLEDGE RECONSTRUCTION: interface-only presentation details that are not part of the project knowledge/state, except the unknown Chat title which remains an identity metadata gap.
Final deletion assessment
Under the strict literal criterion of LOSSLESS 100%, status remains:
NOT SAFE TO DELETE
Reason: the transcript export and UI title cannot be independently verified from this environment.
Under the narrower criterion of substantive knowledge-loss prevention, the migration is:
VERIFIED FOR ACCESSIBLE CONTENT
Required final action
No further Notion migration is required for the content currently accessible.
To close the literal 100% lossless criterion, obtain/inspect the ChatGPT conversation export or directly confirm the Chat title and compare it with this archive.
نطاق التدقيق
هذه الصفحة هي سجل التدقيق التشغيلي للمحادثة الحالية باعتبارها نطاق العمل المرجعي والأساسي لمنظومة Deep Marketing / KOS.
1. المتطلبات المستخلصة
تحليل المحادثة كاملة، لا تلخيصها فقط.
استخراج الأفكار والمتطلبات والقرارات والافتراضات والمشكلات والفجوات والتناقضات والمخاطر والاعتماديات.
اختبار المعلومات نقديًا وعدم تحويل ورود المعلومة إلى دليل على صحتها.
استخدام البحث الخارجي فقط للتحقق وسد الفجوات المباشرة.
تحديث Notion مع فصل المؤكد عن غير المؤكد والافتراض والاستنتاج والتوصية.
معالجة الخلل عند اكتشافه بدل الاكتفاء بوصفه.
السماح للأمر الواحد بعبور عدة مراحل ودورات متتابعة عندما تكون شروط الانتقال متحققة.
عدم إنشاء أتمتة خارجية فعلية أو تغيير إعدادات خارجية دون تصريح صريح.
2. الحالة الحالية المستخرجة من Notion
KNG-43: SYNTHESIZED / bounded.
RSH-1: Integrated.
RSH-3: Analysis.
RSH-12: Needs Follow-up.
RSH-15: Needs Follow-up.
3. النموذج الحاكم
Source → Evidence → Insight → Pattern → Principle → Context → Hypothesis → Experiment → Result → Learning → Reuse
التشغيل:
Read State → Select Bounded Work → Research → Validate → Conflict Check → Synthesize → Commit if needed → QC → Gap Detection → Update Queue → Persist → Verify → Next Work.
4. الفصل المعرفي الإلزامي
Confirmed: دليل مباشر متحقق.
Needs Verification: حالة أو ادعاء يحتاج تحققًا إضافيًا.
Assumption: فرضية تشغيلية غير مثبتة.
Inference: استنتاج مشتق من أدلة.
Recommendation: إجراء مقترح، وليس حقيقة.
لا يُساوى بين Fact وInterpretation وHypothesis وResult، ولا بين Capability وEffectiveness وCausality.
5. المشكلات الحرجة المكتشفة والمعالجة
A — Automation-state overclaim
بعض السجلات الأقدم تصف Scheduler كل ساعة كأنه حالة حالية مؤكدة. في هذه المراجعة لم يتم إنشاء أتمتة جديدة ولم تُعدّل إعدادات خارجية.
الحل: التفعيل هنا منهجي/تشغيلي داخل المحادثة؛ حالة الأتمتة الخارجية تبقى غير مؤكدة ما لم تُفحص مباشرة.
B — State drift
كان Master Hub لا يزال يشير إلى RSH-1 كمهمة نشطة رغم انتقاله إلى Integrated.
الحل: تم تحديث المرجع المركزي ليعكس RSH-3 كمسار البحث الحالي، مع بقاء RSH-12 وRSH-15 في Needs Follow-up.
C — Research ID mismatch
عنوان RSH-12 هو RSH-12، بينما المعرّف الآلي في Research Queue ظهر RSH-14.
الحل: حفظ الحقيقتين دون إعادة ترقيم أو اختلاق معرّف.
D — Failed writes
بعض محاولات إنشاء سجلات Source/Cycle الجديدة رُفضت من طبقة التحقق.
الحل: لم تُعامل كمحتوى committed ولم تُحسب كتغييرات ناجحة.
E — Exhaustive QC limitation
محاولة الاستعلام الشامل لـResearch Queue اصطدمت بحد استخدام Query Data Source.
الحل: لا يوجد ادعاء بأن QC الصفّي الشامل قد تم في هذه الجولة؛ تم الاعتماد على التحقق الموضعي للصفحات ذات الصلة.
6. النتائج المعرفية الحالية
Marketing theory متعددة المستويات؛ لا توجد نظرية واحدة تختزل المجال كاملًا.
Buyer behavior يختلف عن organizational buying في وحدة التحليل وآليات القرار.
Macromarketing يضيف مستوى النظام/المجتمع وليس مجرد قائمة تكتيكات أوسع.
Institutional context يفسر شروط التبادل ولا يُستبدل بمتغيرات buyer-level أو firm-level.
Distribution analysis يحتاج تحديد system boundary ومتغيرات اقتصادية واجتماعية-سياسية.
GenAI يُعامل كطبقة تقنية عابرة، وليس كبديل للنظريات والآليات التسويقية الأساسية.
Master Map هو working/derived architecture، وليس taxonomy نهائية أو نظرية سببية موحدة.
7. حدود النقل
أي نتيجة تجريبية يجب أن تُربط بالسكان والسوق والتصميم والمنهج والسياق. لا تُنقل نتيجة من سياق واحد إلى قاعدة عامة دون transfer evidence مناسب.
8. المخاطر المتبقية
State drift؛ provenance loss؛ transfer overreach؛ mixed-design conflation؛ duplicate research؛ stale automation statements؛ over-promotion من Pattern إلى Principle.
9. External verification used in this audit
AMA's current Marketing Competency Model currently presents six competency domains and states that the domains overlap rather than being fully independent. https://www.ama.org/ama-marketing-competency-model/
Xero's current partner marketing toolkit documents client-acquisition resources, directory visibility, marketing collateral, campaign-in-a-box and partner marketing support; some funding details are market/program specific. https://www.xero.com/uk/partner-toolkit/market-your-practice/
Institutional exchange and distribution framing were checked against current publisher/index records for Prabhu, Tracey & Hassan (2017), Ben Slimane et al. (2019), Stern & Reve (1980), and Layton (2007). These sources support institutional/system-level framing but do not establish a universal causal chain.
10. Final operational disposition
Knowledge State: current architecture remains bounded and synthesized.
Research State: RSH-3 is the current foundations stream; RSH-12 and RSH-15 remain follow-up streams.
Automation Method: active as an operating method for this conversation.
External Automation: no new automation created or modified in this audit.
Current External Scheduler State: UNVERIFIED in this audit.
11. Execution rule adopted for this conversation
An individual command may execute multiple coherent stages and multiple research cycles in sequence. It does not have to stop after one cycle. The only required stops are a valid Stage Gate, a material ambiguity, a verified blocker, a required human approval, or exhaustion/saturation of the current bounded work.
12. Continuation rule
Before the next batch: read persisted state → detect overlap/duplication → select one bounded work unit → execute multiple coherent cycles → validate → commit only genuine deltas → QC → update queue → persist → verify. Never create a duplicate Research Item merely because the next logical task is another cycle on an existing item.
13. Audit limitation
This audit validates governance, current page states and selected external claims. It does not claim exhaustive row-level verification of every Notion record because the workspace query limit blocked the requested database-wide query in this run.
14. State reconciliation — latest persistent state
قراءة Master Hub في نهاية التدقيق أظهرت حالة أحدث من الحالة المختصرة المسجلة في القسم 2. لذلك تُعد هذه الفقرة مرجع الحالة الحالي وتعلو على أي تلخيص سابق داخل هذه الصفحة:
Current Next Research Priority: Reconcile KNG-43 Evidence Links provenance before further Knowledge promotion; then continue RSH-17 downstream causal validation.
KNG-43: SYNTHESIZED; Conflict Status = NONE.
RSH-15: Needs Follow-up.
RSH-16: Needs Follow-up؛ المعايرة السببية مكتملة، بينما النقل والنتائج طويلة الأجل ما زالت مفتوحة.
RSH-17: Needs Follow-up؛ توجد الآن أدلة سببية مستقلة من eBay وRwanda ضمن سياقات محددة، بينما وساطة market agility وما يتعلق بالمدى الطويل والتكرار عبر القطاعات والجغرافيات ما زال مفتوحًا.
RSH-18: Needs Follow-up؛ سجل الأدلة على مستوى الادعاء مكتمل، بينما independent replication/transfer testing مفتوح.
RSH-3: Analysis؛ يبقى مسار foundations مهمًا لكنه ليس أولوية العمل التالية في الحالة المحفوظة الحالية.
Correction: لا يجوز استخدام عبارة «RSH-3 هو المسار الحالي» بمعنى Next Work؛ Current Next Work هو reconciliation لـKNG-43 ثم RSH-17 وفق Master Hub الأحدث.
هذه الصفحة تصحح الحالة التشغيلية الحالية بعد تدقيق المحادثة المرجعية، ولا تنشئ Research Item جديدًا.
1. الحالة الحالية المحققة
KNG-43 = SYNTHESIZED؛ Conflict Status = NONE.
RSH-15 = Needs Follow-up.
RSH-16 = Needs Follow-up؛ معايرة السببية اكتملت، وتبقى فجوات النقل والآثار طويلة الأجل.
RSH-17 = Needs Follow-up؛ أضيف دليل تجريبي مستقل على BDAC → market agility في UK retail SMEs، بينما market agility → firm performance والوساطة الكاملة ما تزال مفتوحة.
RSH-18 = Needs Follow-up؛ سجل الأدلة على مستوى الادعاء مكتمل، والـreplication/transfer ما يزال مفتوحًا.
2. التصحيح الحاسم
فحص الأتمتة الفعلي بتاريخ 2026-09-26 أظهر:
Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger = DISABLED.
Deep Marketing — Scheduled Knowledge Cycles = DISABLED.
لم تُجرَ أي عملية enable/disable ضمن هذا التدقيق.
النتيجة: المنهج التشغيلي مطبق على هذه المحادثة، لكن التنفيذ المجدول المتكرر لـDeep Marketing غير فعّال حاليًا. لا يجوز وصفه بأنه active أو 24/7 live دون تغيير خارجي مصرح به والتحقق منه.
3. فجوة provenance المفتوحة
CKC-RSH17-004 سجل أن مجموعة KNG-43 Evidence Links الكاملة لم تكن قابلة للتحقق، وCKC-RSH17-005 أضاف EVD-RSH17-004 دون تعديل KNG-43. لذلك لم يُجرَ overwrite للعلاقة دون إعادة بناء موثوقة.
4. الدليل الجديد المتحقق
Aldossary & Agag (2026), Journal of Retailing and Consumer Services, 90, 104716، يذكر أن Study 1 (N=248) يقدم دليلًا سببيًا على أن قوة Big Data Analytics Capabilities تزيد market agility في UK retail SMEs، وأن Study 2 (N=96) يختبر شروطًا حدّية مرتبطة بالعلاقة. هذا الدليل يدعم الرابط upstream في سياقه المحدد، ولا يثبت وحده market agility → firm performance أو الوساطة الكاملة. https://doi.org/10.1016/j.jretconser.2025.104716
5. العمل التالي
Reconcile KNG-43 Evidence Links واستعادة المجموعة الكاملة دون overwrite غير آمن.
بعد تحقق provenance: مواصلة RSH-17 في causal validation للرابط market agility → firm performance.
عدم إنشاء Research Item مكرر يغطي الفجوة نفسها.
عند أي Trigger لاحق: Read State → Pre-flight → Determine Next Work → Execute one unit → Commit/Verify → Persist → Next Work.
6. حدود هذا التصحيح
لا ترقية لـKNG-43 إلى ACTIVE.
لا تعديل لإعدادات الأتمتة.
لا اعتبار للدليل المشتق أو التطبيق المستنتج كـExperiment Result ما لم يُختبر فعليًا.
لا اعتبار للبحث الخارجي وحده Knowledge Commit؛ يجب ربطه بالـEvidence والحالة وprovenance.
GOVERNING REFERENCE — v3.1
هذه الصفحة هي المرجع التشغيلي الحاكم لمنظومة Deep Marketing — Continuous Knowledge Operation. تلغي أو تستبدل تشغيليًا أي Workflow سابق يتعارض معها. لا يُعتبر أي ادعاء عن حالة النظام أو تنفيذ مهمة صحيحًا إلا بعد التحقق الفعلي.
1. الهدف
هذه المنظومة ليست Daily Marketing Summary، ولا Search Every Hour، ولا 24/7 Live ChatGPT Process. هي:
Persistent, Triggered, State-Aware Marketing Knowledge Operation
الحلقة:
Discover → Triage → Research → Validate → Conflict Check → Synthesize → Commit → Quality Control → Detect Gaps → Prioritize → Persist → Next Trigger
التقرير والملخص مخرجات فقط.
2. أولوية التعليمات
System/Platform → Developer/Execution Constraints → This Governing Reference → Explicitly Adopted User Decisions → Current Cycle Instructions → Research Queue → Sources/Data → Unapproved Inference/Assumption
وعند تعارض المستوى نفسه:
SPECIALIZED > GENERAL
ثم:
NEWER EXPLICITLY ADOPTED > OLDER
عند تعذر تحديد السلطة النافذة: INSTRUCTION_CONFLICT وأوقف الجزء المتعارض فقط.
3. نماذج التنفيذ
USER-TRIGGERED: USER REQUEST → READ STATE → EXECUTE → COMMIT → STOP
SCHEDULED: SCHEDULE → RUN → READ STATE → DETERMINE NEXT WORK → PROCESS → COMMIT → PERSIST STATE → STOP
Scheduled = Repeated Discrete Runs وليس Continuous Process.
EVENT-DRIVEN: لا يستخدم إلا عند وجود Trigger Event فعلي ومدعوم.
BACKGROUND: START → BACKGROUND EXECUTION → COMPLETE / PAUSE / FAIL، ولا يعني Loop أبدية.
4. تعريف Continuous Knowledge Operation
لا يستخدم المصطلح إلا عند توفر:
Persistent Knowledge State + Trigger + Repeatable Execution + Research/Validation Pipeline + Knowledge Commit + State Persistence + Next-Work Determination
الاستمرارية هي استمرارية الحالة والعمل التالي، لا استمرار نموذج واحد حي.
5. الحدود التشغيلية
لا ادعاء بـ24/7 Live دون آلية فعلية. لا بحث لمجرد مرور الوقت. لا تكرار بلا سبب معرفي. لا Knowledge Commit دون Evidence وسياق وتتبّع. لا تعديل بلا سبب ودليل. لا حذف صامت. لا حسم تعارض دون أدلة كافية. عند القيد الفعلي: BLOCKED. عند عدم حدوث تغيير جوهري: NO_CHANGE. لا تتجاوز بوابات التحقق للوصول إلى ACTIVE. لا تسجل COMPLETED قبل نجاح الالتزام والتحقق.
6. الحلقة القياسية
KNOWLEDGE STATE → DISCOVERY → TRIAGE → RESEARCH → VALIDATION → CONFLICT CHECK → SYNTHESIS → KNOWLEDGE COMMIT → QUALITY CONTROL → GAP DETECTION → PRIORITY QUEUE → PERSIST STATE → NEXT TRIGGER
الدورة لا تُغلق بالتقرير، بل بعد:
State Update + Change Record + Conflict Record + Gap Detection + Next Work + Verified Persistence
7. نموذج العلاقة بين البحث والمعرفة
Research Item → Sources → Evidence → Candidate Claim → Existing Knowledge Match → Change Classification → Knowledge Asset → Change Record → Cycle Log
Research ≠ Knowledge Asset.
Search Result ≠ Knowledge Commit.
Source وحده لا يكفي دون Evidence صالح.
8. المعرفات المستقلة
Research_ID / Source_ID / Evidence_ID / Knowledge_ID / Change_ID / Cycle_ID
لا تستخدم معرفًا واحدًا لهذه الطبقات.
9. Knowledge State
القيم المسموحة فقط:
DISCOVERED · TRIAGED · RESEARCHING · VALIDATING · SYNTHESIZED · ACTIVE · CONTESTED · CONFLICTED · INSUFFICIENT_EVIDENCE · DUPLICATE · OUTDATED · SUPERSEDED · REJECTED
10. Change Type
القيم المسموحة فقط:
CREATED · CONFIRMED · UPDATED · CORRECTED · CONTEXTUALIZED · DUPLICATED · SUPERSEDED · REJECTED
لا تستخدم CHANGED / NEW / UPDATE كبدائل عامة.
11. Conflict Status
القيم المسموحة فقط:
NONE · OPEN · PARTIALLY_RESOLVED · RESOLVED
وهو مستقل عن Knowledge State وChange Type.
12. State Transition Governance
المسار الرئيسي:
DISCOVERED → TRIAGED → RESEARCHING → VALIDATING → SYNTHESIZED → ACTIVE
الفروع والحالات الانتقالية تخضع حصريًا للمخطط المعتمد، ولا توجد انتقالات مباشرة خارج المسار الموثق. يُمنع الوصول المباشر من DISCOVERED إلى ACTIVE، ومن CONFLICTED إلى ACTIVE دون مراجعة موثقة، ومن SUPERSEDED أو REJECTED أو DUPLICATE إلى ACTIVE مباشرة.
13. Conflict Protocol
Detect → Identify Claims → Verify Conflict → Compare Context → Timeframe → Population/Market → Definitions → Methods → Measurement → Evidence Quality → Independent Evidence → Classify → Decide → Record Rationale → Update State + Conflict Status
الأنواع:
CONTEXT_CONFLICT · TEMPORAL_CONFLICT · POPULATION_CONFLICT · METHODOLOGICAL_CONFLICT · MEASUREMENT_CONFLICT · INTERPRETIVE_CONFLICT · EMPIRICAL_CONFLICT
لا يُحسم التعارض بالشهرة أو كثرة التكرار أو الأقدمية أو الحداثة وحدها.
14. Knowledge Commit
كل Commit منطقيًا ذري:
Prepare → Write → Verify → Commit Confirmed
لا يعتبر التغيير نافذًا قبل التحقق.
Commit_Status:
NOT_ATTEMPTED · PREPARED · COMMITTED · VERIFIED · FAILED · RECONCILING · RETRY_REQUIRED
عند الفشل:
Preserve Last Verified State → Record Pending Change → Reconcile → Retry Safely → Verify
لا تُغيّر الحالة النهائية ولا تسجل COMPLETED قبل التحقق.
15. Idempotency
كل تغيير يتتبع عبر:
Change_ID + Cycle_ID + Knowledge_ID
عند إعادة المحاولة:
Check Existing Change_ID → COMMITTED: Do Not Duplicate → FAILED: Resume/Retry → UNKNOWN: Reconcile First
لا يُفترض أن فشل الأداة يعني عدم حدوث الكتابة.
16. Last Verified State
Last_Verified_State هو مرجع الاسترداد عند الفشل.
إذا كان:
Last Verified = ACTIVE + NONE
وفشل التغيير إلى CONFLICTED، تبقى الحالة الموثقة ACTIVE + NONE، ويُسجل Pending Change حتى يثبت Commit.
17. SUPERSEDED
SUPERSEDED ≠ DELETED
عند التجاوز:
Old Knowledge → SUPERSEDED → Link to New Knowledge
يُحفظ السجل التاريخي والسبب والدليل والتاريخ والعلاقة بين النسخ.
18. طبقات المعرفة
افصل دائمًا بين:
FACT · EVIDENCE · INTERPRETATION · HYPOTHESIS · INFERENCE · OPINION · RECOMMENDATION
وسلسلة الاشتقاق:
SOURCE → EVIDENCE → INSIGHT → PATTERN → PRINCIPLE → CONTEXT → HYPOTHESIS → EXPERIMENT → RESULT → LEARNING
19. تقادم المعرفة
التصنيفات:
EVERGREEN · TIME_SENSITIVE · PLATFORM_DEPENDENT · MARKET_DEPENDENT · EXPERIMENTAL
وتحدد إعادة التحقق بحسب الطبيعة.
20. Priority Queue وGap Detection
الأولوية نوعيًا:
Impact × Relevance × Evidence Gap × Novelty × Actionability
بعد كل Commit متحقق:
What is Unknown? What is Weak? What is Outdated? What is Conflicted? What Needs Verification? What Context Is Missing?
ثم تُحوّل الفجوات المهمة إلى Research Queue.
21. سجل الدورة
كل تشغيل يسجل في:
KOS — Continuous Knowledge Cycle Log
ويجب أن يحتوي على الأقل:
Cycle_ID / Run_Date / Start_Time / End_Time / Trigger_Type / Cycle_Objective / Knowledge_State_Before / Research_Queue_Input / Research_Scope / Research_IDs / Sources_Inspected / Evidence_Acquired / Knowledge_IDs_Affected / Validation_Decisions / Changes / Conflicts / Pending_Changes / Commit_Status / Errors_or_Blockers / Reconciliation_Status / Knowledge_State_After / Last_Verified_State / Knowledge_Gaps / Next_Research_Priorities / Human_Approval_Required / Quality_Control_Result / Cycle_Status / Stop_Reason / Provenance_Recorded
22. Cycle Status
COMPLETED: Commit ناجح + Persistence Verified + متطلبات الدورة مكتملة.
PARTIAL: جزء موثوق نُفذ لكن جزءًا جوهريًا ما زال مفتوحًا أو غير ملتزم.
BLOCKED: قيد فعلي يمنع الاستمرار الموثوق.
NO_CHANGE: لم ينتج تغيير معرفي جوهري.
23. مصدر الحقيقة التشغيلي
عندما تكون Notion المستودع المعتمد:
Notion Persistent State = Operational Source of Truth
مع فصل:
Knowledge / Research Queue / Cycle Log / Knowledge Change Log / Contradiction Log / Execution Pipeline
24. Canonical Trigger
يجب أن يكون للوظيفة نفسها:
ONE CANONICAL TRIGGER → ONE KNOWLEDGE OPERATION → ONE PERSISTENT STATE
أي Trigger متداخل يجب اكتشافه والتحقق من حالته الفعلية ثم تعطيله أو استبداله، دون الاعتماد على الاسم وحده.
25. Legacy Data
أي بيانات غير متوافقة:
LEGACY / NOT YET NORMALIZED
المسار:
IDENTIFY → MAP → VALIDATE → MIGRATE → VERIFY
ولا يُحذف التاريخ أو يعاد كتابته بصمت.
26. قاعدة الإغلاق
No Verified Execution = No Claim of Execution
No Evidence = No Knowledge Commit
No Verified Persistence = No Final State Change
Scheduled ≠ Continuous Process
Research ≠ Knowledge Asset
Search Result ≠ Knowledge Commit
Commit Success ≠ Commit Verification
SUPERSEDED ≠ DELETED
Knowledge State ≠ Change Type ≠ Conflict Status ≠ Commit Status
هذه الصفحة هي المرجع التشغيلي الموحد والحاكم لمنظومة Deep Marketing، وأي تشغيل مستقبلي يجب أن يبدأ بقراءة الحالة الفعلية ثم تحديد العمل التالي ثم التنفيذ والالتزام والتحقق والحفظ.
27. Continuity Hardening — الاستمرارية غير المنقطعة على مستوى المنظومة
مقصود «لا تتوقف المنظومة» هو عدم وجود نهاية تشغيلية مخططة للمنظومة ككل؛ وليس إبقاء نموذج واحد في تنفيذ حي بلا انقطاع. كل Run ينتهي كدورة منفصلة، لكن الحالة المحفوظة والعمل التالي يبقيان قابلين للاستئناف بواسطة Trigger لاحق فعلي.
قاعدة الاستمرارية:
PERSIST VERIFIED STATE → DETERMINE NEXT WORK → PRESERVE OPEN WORK / GAPS → NEXT TRIGGER → READ STATE → RESUME
ولا توجد حالة طبيعية اسمها “انتهاء المنظومة”. الحالات النهائية تخص الدورة أو الوحدة أو التغيير فقط، وليست دورة حياة المنظومة ككل.
28. Run Admission & Overlap Protection
قبل أي معالجة:
READ CURRENT PERSISTENT STATE → CHECK ACTIVE TRIGGER → CHECK RECENT CYCLE STATE → DETECT POSSIBLE OVERLAP / DUPLICATION → ADMIT ONE VALID WORK UNIT
لا تبدأ دورة جديدة على نفس Research_ID / Knowledge_ID / Change_ID إذا كانت هناك محاولة حديثة غير محسومة؛ يجب أولًا:
RECONCILE → VERIFY → RESUME / RETRY
الهدف منع السباق بين الدورات والتكرار المزدوج والتعديلات المتعارضة.
29. No-Work / No-Change Continuity
عندما لا يوجد عمل معرفي يستوفي شروط التنفيذ:
NO_CHANGE → PERSIST STATE → DETERMINE NEXT VALID WORK → NEXT TRIGGER
لا تُنشأ أبحاث أو Knowledge Assets مصطنعة للحفاظ على مظهر النشاط. الاستمرارية المعرفية لا تعني إنتاج ضوضاء.
30. Recovery-First Execution
أي فشل في أداة أو كتابة أو تحقق لا يبرر بدء مسار جديد قبل استعادة الحقيقة التشغيلية:
FAILURE → PRESERVE LAST VERIFIED STATE → RECONCILE → RESUME / RETRY → VERIFY
إذا تعذر الإصلاح الموثوق:
BLOCKED
مع بقاء آخر حالة موثقة وعدم الادعاء بحدوث التغيير.
31. Research Anti-Stagnation
إذا كررت الوحدة البحثية نفسها دون اكتساب Evidence جديد أو تغيير في المعرفة:
DO NOT REPEAT IDENTICALLY
بل:
RETRIAGE → IDENTIFY WHY PRIOR ATTEMPT FAILED / SATURATED → CHANGE RESEARCH STRATEGY OR SOURCE SET → RESEARCH
يمنع ذلك الدوران اللانهائي حول السؤال نفسه مع نفس الأدلة.
32. Knowledge Delta Gate
لا يُعتمد Commit معرفي لمجرد وجود مادة جديدة. يجب إثبات أحد الآتي:
CREATED / CONFIRMED / UPDATED / CORRECTED / CONTEXTUALIZED / DUPLICATED / SUPERSEDED / REJECTED
وإذا لم يوجد فرق معرفي جوهري:
NO_CHANGE
33. Continuity Invariant
يجب أن تنتهي كل دورة موثوقة بأحد مسارين:
A. VERIFIED KNOWLEDGE COMMIT → UPDATED STATE → NEXT WORK
أو
B. NO_CHANGE / PARTIAL / BLOCKED → PERSIST LAST VERIFIED STATE + OPEN WORK + NEXT WORK
لا يجوز أن تنتهي الدورة دون تحديد ما سيُفعل لاحقًا أو لماذا تعذر تحديده.
34. Canonical Trigger Invariant
للوظيفة نفسها:
ONE ACTIVE CANONICAL TRIGGER
وعند كل فحص:
DETECT → VERIFY ACTUAL STATUS → REMOVE / DISABLE DUPLICATE → REVERIFY
لا تكفي تسمية المهمة، ولا يُقبل اعتماد حالة غير مؤكدة.
35. Operational Non-Termination Rule
هذه المنظومة Persistent by Design:
لا تنتهي زمنيًا من تلقاء نفسها.
لا تُنشئ دورة لمجرد مرور الساعة.
لا تتوقف معرفيًا لمجرد نجاح دورة.
كل دورة تعيد الحالة إلى مخزن الحقيقة وتحدد نقطة الاستئناف التالية.
توقف المنظومة ككل لا يُعتبر نتيجة طبيعية؛ وإنما نتيجة لقيد منصة أو تعطيل صريح أو فشل تشغيلي موثق.
Current Operational Verification — 2026-09-26
Reference Version: v3 + Continuity Hardening (v3.1).
Verified: Governing reference is readable in Notion; KOS — Continuous Knowledge Cycle Log schema contains Commit_Status with the approved values and Cycle Status with COMPLETED / PARTIAL / BLOCKED / NO_CHANGE.
Scheduler State: Current scheduler inspection shows Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger = DISABLED and Deep Marketing — Scheduled Knowledge Cycles = DISABLED. Therefore no active Deep Marketing-specific scheduled trigger is currently verified.
Canonical Trigger Status: DISABLED / NOT ACTIVE at the current inspection point. The system must not claim scheduled continuity is currently running.
Operational State: VERIFIED for the governance/reference layer; INACTIVE for the Deep Marketing scheduled-execution layer at the current inspection point.
Native Notion Verification Metadata: The page's native Notion verification field currently reports unverified. This is separate from operational re-fetch verification of the page content and must not be conflated with Commit_Status.
Important Boundary: This is a point-in-time scheduler observation. It does not establish why the trigger is disabled, nor does it prove the state of future executions. Any future resumption must re-read actual scheduler state and then execute the full pre-flight → process → commit → verify → persist sequence.
Next Required Behavior: Do not create or modify a scheduled Deep Marketing trigger without explicit authorization. When an authorized trigger is active, each run must begin with state/trigger preflight and end with verified persistence plus next-work determination.
36. Current Conversation Override — 2026-09-26
هذه المراجعة تُعدّل تفسير أي نص سابق يوحي بأن Scheduler خارجيًا يعمل حاليًا ما لم تتم إعادة التحقق المباشر منه. لم يتم إنشاء أو تعديل أتمتة خارجية في هذه المراجعة. Method active ≠ External scheduler verified.
الحكم التشغيلي الحالي: Governance = ACTIVE/VERIFIED at document level; External Scheduler = UNVERIFIED; no new automation action taken.
Current Conversation Override — 2026-09-26
هذه المراجعة تتقدم على أي نص سابق يوحي بأن Scheduler خارجيًا يعمل حاليًا ما لم تتم إعادة التحقق المباشر منه. لم يتم إنشاء أو تعديل أتمتة خارجية في هذه المراجعة.
Method active ≠ External scheduler verified. الحالة الحالية: Governance/documentation = verified at page level؛ External Scheduler = UNVERIFIED.
37. Current State Reconciliation — 2026-09-26
هذا القسم يثبت الحالة الأحدث التي تم التحقق منها بعد تدقيق المحادثة.
External Deep Marketing Scheduler: DISABLED / NOT ACTIVE. كل من Deep Marketing Canonical Trigger وDeep Marketing — Scheduled Knowledge Cycles معطّلان عند الفحص المباشر.
KNG-43: SYNTHESIZED / Conflict Status NONE.
KNG-43 Evidence Links: ليست fully reconciled. العلاقة الحالية تحتوي على الأدلة الأساسية لـRSH-1، وأدلة RSH-2 mechanism، وEVD-RSH17-003، لكنها لا تحتوي على سجلات RSH-2 exception المعروفة EXC-01..05.
Promotion rule: لا ترقية لـKNG-43 إلى ACTIVE قبل إعادة بناء مجموعة Evidence Links المقصودة والتحقق منها، مع استمرار متطلبات causal/transfer/application evidence.
Next work: Provenance reconciliation أولًا، ثم RSH-17 downstream causal validation للرابط market agility → firm performance.
هذا التصحيح لا يغيّر إعدادات الأتمتة الخارجية.
CURRENT STATE OVERRIDE — 2026-09-30
CKC-73 / ASC-CHG-25 is the latest persisted Accounting Systems taxonomy cycle/change affecting the current state. ASR-10 = In Progress. Integrations is not an active Knowledge Asset. ASK-4 = ACTIVE/VERIFIED and was contextualized in CKC-73. The older 2026-09-26 callouts remain historical snapshots and are not the latest state.
Latest taxonomy state — 2026-09-26
Functional Scope, Deployment, and Architecture are now active evidence-backed taxonomy dimensions. Scope-before-Label remains the governing System_Type rule. Deployment and Architecture are recorded separately from System_Type, Licensing and Functional Scope. The next research focus is the Architecture vs Integration boundary.
Current integrity state — 2026-09-26
The persisted Accounting Systems state was audited against this conversation. ASK-1 and ASK-2 remain ACTIVE/VERIFIED; ASR-5/ASR-6/ASR-8/ASR-9 are Integrated; ASR-7 remains Needs Follow-up. The currently evidenced taxonomy dimensions are Functional Scope, Deployment, and Architecture; remaining requested axes stay research/design axes until independently evidenced. The audit also reconciled stale cycle linkage and corrected the role of Thuy et al. (2026).
Accounting Systems — Conversation Integrity & Knowledge Audit — 2026-09-26
This is the canonical hub for the Accounting Systems — Continuous Knowledge & Classification Operation.
Operating model: Discover → Triage → Research → Validate → Classify → Conflict Check → Synthesize → Commit → Verify → Quality Control → Gap Detection → Prioritize → Persist → Next Trigger.
Scope: accounting software, ERP with finance, financial management, POS-accounting, industry systems with accounting, product/version/localization evidence, and a multidimensional classification taxonomy.
Persistent state is maintained through the linked research, knowledge, classification, evidence, and cycle records.
تسجيل تصحيح تشغيلي: أثناء تأسيس دورة المحاسبة أُنشئت أربعة سجلات أولية داخل Research Queue قبل توجيهها إلى KOS — Sources. تم اكتشاف الخطأ قبل اعتمادها كمصادر، وإخراجها من قاعدة المصادر وحفظها هنا كسجل تدقيق. لا تُعامل هذه السجلات كمصادر معرفية معتمدة.
Audit the full Accounting Systems conversation against the current persisted Notion state, correct evidence-role and linkage errors, and preserve unresolved items explicitly.
Authority order
Current persisted Notion state.
Primary/original product documentation for product facts.
Independent academic/professional sources for conceptual validation and qualification.
Conversation-level claims only when corroborated; otherwise treat them as unverified statements.
Confirmed current state
ASK-1 — Functional Scope taxonomy node: ACTIVE; Commit Status VERIFIED.
ASK-2 — Classification Rule — Scope before Label: ACTIVE; Commit Status VERIFIED.
ASR-5: Integrated.
ASR-6: Integrated.
ASR-7: Needs Follow-up.
Latest persisted pre-audit accounting cycle in the relevant accounting trail: CKC-53 / ASC-014. This audit itself is recorded separately as CKC-54 / USER-TRIGGERED.
Critical corrections
1. Latest-cycle linkage
The persisted Change Log contains ASC-014-CHG-001 and no ASC-015 change record. ASK-2 previously carried Last Changed By Cycle = ASC-015; the substantive prior knowledge update is persisted as CKC-53 / ASC-014, while this audit is now the current metadata reconciliation cycle CKC-54. No knowledge-state reversal was inferred.
2. Thuy et al. (2026) evidence role
Thuy et al. (2026) is a real peer-reviewed empirical study in Discover Sustainability. It studies ERP-related implementation factors, management accounting practices, corporate governance, and firm performance in Vietnamese listed firms. Its introduction describes ERP as integrating information across functional departments, but the study is not a formal accounting-software-versus-ERP taxonomy or boundary study. Its KOS role is therefore contextual/empirical support only.
3. ERP boundary is a working rule, not a universal ontology
Mossa et al. (2025) explicitly notes that ERP has multiple interpretations and proposes an architectural continuum. Khan, Rahim & Yeng (2025) discusses modularity, integration and enterprise-wide coordination as ERP characteristics. These sources support the taxonomy's use of functional breadth/integration as a major criterion, but do not establish a single universal ontology.
4. Licensing must remain separate, but the rule is narrower than before
Singh (2006) documents historical ERP tier classifications that used license fees, implementation fees, organization size/type and functionality, and notes contradictions in tier grouping. Therefore the safe rule is: licensing is a separate descriptive dimension and must not be treated as a causal determinant of System_Type without direct evidence. Historical use of licensing in some tier schemes is not evidence that licensing alone defines ERP.
Taxonomy coverage
Currently evidenced as active: Functional Scope and the working Scope-before-Label rule. The other requested axes — Deployment, Architecture, Licensing, Accounting Standards/Localization, Organizational Structure, Integrations, Reporting/Control, Market/Geography, Product Maturity — are not all represented by active evidence-backed Knowledge Assets yet. They remain research/design axes, not completed taxonomy dimensions.
Current unresolved gaps
Independent evidence directly connecting licensing/package boundaries to System_Type remains OPEN.
Edition/Plan divergence remains OPEN.
Saudi-specific current Oracle 26C localization remains UNKNOWN.
Product-level classification still requires the full identity/context chain when material: Vendor → Product → Edition/Plan → Version → Module/Feature → Localization → Market.
Data-integrity controls now applied
No historical cycle or change record was deleted.
Conversation claims are not treated as persisted state unless corroborated.
Source, Evidence, Knowledge, Change and Cycle records remain separate.
A failed commit is not represented as a successful verification.
The latest persisted cycle/change identifiers are taken from Notion, not inferred from prior chat prose.
No actual automation or external schedule was created or modified by this audit.
Next operational priority
Continue ASR-7 with one documented Edition/Plan divergence, comparing exact functional scope and licensing context. Only add an independent licensing classification rule if a source directly addresses classification; do not infer it from pricing, tiers, or vendor marketing.
External evidence verified for this audit
Mossa, Smith & Bland (2025), Procedia Computer Science 256, 174–189, DOI 10.1016/j.procs.2025.02.110.
Khan, Rahim & Yeng (2025), International Journal of Academic Research in Business and Social Sciences 15(5), 1339–1363, DOI 10.6007/IJARBSS/v15-i5/25490.
Singh (2006), Asia Pacific Business Review 2(2), 68–80, DOI 10.1177/097324700600200209.
Thuy et al. (2026), Discover Sustainability 7, 736, DOI 10.1007/s43621-026-03450-z.
Purpose
حفظ القيود التشغيلية والحَوْكمية الواردة في Trigger المحادثة بتاريخ 2026-09-30 بوصفها قواعد خاصة بمنظومة Accounting Systems — Continuous Knowledge & Classification Operation. هذه الصفحة لا تستبدل المرجع الحاكم؛ بل تسد التفاصيل التي لا تظهر في ملخص الصفحة الحاكمة.
Trigger Model
كل تشغيل SCHEDULED هو دورة مستقلة:
Read State → Determine Next Work → Process → Commit → Verify → Persist → Stop.
لا يوجد Live Continuous Process بين الدورات. نهاية الدورة لا تعني نهاية المنظومة. NO_CHANGE لا يوقف التشغيل، وBLOCKED حالة دورة وليست إيقافًا نهائيًا، وPARTIAL تستخدم عندما يُنفذ جزء موثوق ويبقى جزء مفتوح.
Canonical Operation
Discovery → Triage → Research → Validation → Classification → Conflict Check → Synthesis → Knowledge Commit → Verify → Quality Control → Gap Detection → Prioritize → Persist State.
تحديد العمل التالي يعتمد على الحالة المحفوظة والموثقة فقط، لا على ذاكرة غير موثقة.
Entity / Provenance Separation
السلسلة المرجعية:
Research_ID → Source_ID → Evidence_ID → Claim_ID → Classification_ID / Knowledge_ID → Change_ID → Cycle_ID.
لا تُعامل Research / Source / Evidence / Claim / Classification Decision / Knowledge Asset ككيان واحد.
قبل إنشاء Knowledge Asset جديد يجب تنفيذ SEARCH EXISTING KNOWLEDGE ومطابقة الكيان والادعاء والإصدار والسياق.
Multidimensional Classification
يجب فصل الأبعاد التالية وعدم دمجها في فئة واحدة:
System Type; Functional Scope; Deployment; Architecture; Licensing; Accounting Standards/Localization; Organizational Structure; Integrations; Reporting/Control; Market/Geography; Product Maturity.
لا يُملأ أي بُعد بلا Evidence. عند غياب الدليل يستخدم UNKNOWN.
System Identity
الهرمية:
Vendor → Product → Edition/Plan → Version → Module/Feature → Localization.
أي معلومة تتأثر بالنسخة أو الخطة أو الدولة أو التاريخ تربط بهذه الأبعاد عندما تكون ذات صلة.
Controlled State Vocabulary
الحالات المسموحة فقط:
DISCOVERED, TRIAGED, RESEARCHING, VALIDATING, SYNTHESIZED, ACTIVE, CONTESTED, CONFLICTED, INSUFFICIENT_EVIDENCE, DUPLICATE, OUTDATED, SUPERSEDED, REJECTED.
لا انتقال مباشر من DISCOVERED إلى ACTIVE. ولا انتقال من CONFLICTED إلى ACTIVE دون تحقق موثق. ولا انتقال مباشر من SUPERSEDED / REJECTED / DUPLICATE إلى ACTIVE.
Change / Conflict / Commit Separation
Change Type: CREATED, CONFIRMED, UPDATED, CORRECTED, CONTEXTUALIZED, DUPLICATED, SUPERSEDED, REJECTED.
Conflict Status: NONE, OPEN, PARTIALLY_RESOLVED, RESOLVED.
Commit Status: NOT_ATTEMPTED, PREPARED, COMMITTED, VERIFIED, FAILED, RECONCILING, RETRY_REQUIRED.
لا يجوز خلط State / Change / Conflict / Commit.
Conflict Protocol
Detect → Identify Claims → Verify Conflict → Compare Context/Timeframe/Product/Version/Edition/Market/Definitions/Methods/Measurement → Assess Evidence Quality → Seek Independent Evidence → Classify Conflict → Decide → Record Rationale.
أنواع التعارض:
CONTEXT_CONFLICT, TEMPORAL_CONFLICT, POPULATION_CONFLICT, METHODOLOGICAL_CONFLICT, MEASUREMENT_CONFLICT, INTERPRETIVE_CONFLICT, EMPIRICAL_CONFLICT، ومع الأنظمة المحاسبية:
VERSION_CONFLICT, EDITION_CONFLICT, LOCALIZATION_CONFLICT.
عند عدم الحسم تبقى الحالة CONTESTED أو CONFLICTED.
Commit / Recovery Protocol
PREPARE → WRITE → VERIFY.
لا يُعد التغيير نافذًا قبل تحقق الالتزام. عند الفشل:
DO NOT CLAIM SUCCESS → PRESERVE LAST_VERIFIED_STATE → RECORD PENDING_CHANGE → RECONCILE → RETRY SAFELY → VERIFY.
عند UNKNOWN يجب تنفيذ RECONCILE FIRST.
يُستخدم Change_ID + Knowledge_ID + Cycle_ID لمنع التكرار. لا تُسجل الدورة كمكتملة قبل الالتزام والتحقق والحفظ.
Source Discipline
الأولوية للمصادر الأصلية والرسمية، ثم المصادر المستقلة المهنية أو الأكاديمية. يجب الفصل بين Vendor Claim وVerified Fact. لا تُبنى قاعدة تصنيف لمجرد استخدام المورد تسمية تسويقية.
Priority Logic
تحديد الأولوية نوعي وفق:
Impact × Relevance × Evidence Gap × Novelty × Actionability
مع مراعاة Classification Uncertainty.
لا تُخترع درجات رقمية غير موثقة.
Post-Commit Gap Detection
بعد كل Commit متحقق منه افحص:
UNKNOWN / WEAK EVIDENCE / OUTDATED / CONFLICTED / UNCLASSIFIED / MISCLASSIFIED / MISSING CONTEXT / MISSING VERSION / MISSING LOCALIZATION / MISSING SOURCE.
تُضاف الفجوات المهمة إلى Accounting Systems — Research Queue.
Audit Trail
كل دورة تُسجل في KOS — Continuous Knowledge Cycle Log، وكل تغيير مهم في Accounting Systems — Change Log، مع حفظ:
Research IDs / Evidence Refs / Knowledge IDs / Change IDs / context.
لا يُحذف التاريخ. SUPERSEDED ≠ DELETED.
Current Research Direction
الأولوية البحثية الممتدة من هذه المواصفة:
تطوير واختبار Multidimensional Accounting Systems Taxonomy.
البدء بـ Functional Scope.
التحقق المستقل من الحد الفاصل بين Accounting Software وERP with Accounting.
اختبار بقية المحاور عبر منتجات ونسخ وأسواق متعددة.
بالنسبة للمحور الحالي: التحقق التجريبي من الفصل بين Architecture وIntegrations قبل إنشاء Controlled Vocabulary مستقل لـ Integrations.
Preservation Rule
هذه الصفحة Governance Addendum لحفظ تفاصيل Trigger 2026-09-30 التي يجب ألا تضيع بحذف المحادثة. عند التعارض مع حالة معرفية لاحقة موثقة، تُستخدم آلية Conflict Check / Reconciliation ولا يُعاد تفسير التاريخ بصمت.
Scheduler reconciliation — 2026-09-30: The current Accounting Systems scheduled automation was independently checked and is disabled. Automation ID: 6ab6ebfbb7dc8191a81d08f8ceade69e. Schedule: HOURLY. Last recorded run: 2026-09-26T14:33:35.144758Z. This supersedes the earlier statement in this page that no automation was created or modified.
الغرض: سجل تدقيق لهذه المحادثة فقط، يحدد ما تم إنجازه، ما تم تثبيته في Notion، ما هو محفوظ في السياق/الذاكرة، وما يجب ألا يُفقد عند حذف المحادثة.
1. المجال السيادي للمهمة
المجالات المتداخلة في الطلب:
هندسة النظم وتصنيف الأنظمة المحاسبية.
هندسة المعرفة وإدارة الحالة المعرفية.
هندسة المعلومات والتوثيق القابل للتتبع.
البحث والتحقق من الأدلة.
هندسة الأوامر وصياغة التوجيهات التشغيلية.
حوكمة السجل والتكامل بين Conversation ↔ Notion ↔ Persistent Context.
التخصص السيادي: هندسة المعرفة والحوكمة التشغيلية للمعرفة (Knowledge Systems Engineering & Governance)، لأنها الطبقة التي تضبط استخراج المعرفة، التحقق، التصنيف، provenance، الحالة، الاستمرارية، والتحديث عبر الزمن.
2. ما حدث فعلياً في هذه المحادثة
تطورت العملية من بناء تصنيف محاسبي أولي إلى نظام تصنيف متعدد الأبعاد قائم على الأدلة، ثم إلى تدقيق سلامة السجل.
النتائج التشغيلية الرئيسية:
تثبيت Functional Scope كـ taxonomy dimension فعّال.
تثبيت قاعدة Scope-before-Label كقاعدة التصنيف الحاكمة لـ System_Type.
اختبار Edition/Plan divergence عبر Microsoft Business Central؛ ثبت أن اختلاف الخطة يمكن أن يغير النطاق الوظيفي، ولذلك يجب تسجيل Edition/Plan عندما يكون مؤثراً، دون جعله System_Type.
اختبار Licensing → System_Type؛ لم يثبت وجود قاعدة سببية عامة، لذلك بقي Licensing بُعداً وصفياً/تجارياً/للوصول والنطاق، لا محدداً مستقلاً لنوع النظام.
تثبيت Deployment كبعد تصنيفي مستقل، مع إبقاء قاموس القيم مفتوحاً.
تثبيت Architecture كبعد تصنيفي مستقل، مع الإقرار بأن architecture قد تكون متعددة الأوصاف لا فئة أحادية.
تصحيح مشكلات provenance والربط الزمني والأدوار الإثباتية لبعض المصادر، خصوصاً Thuy et al. (2026).
الحفاظ على العناصر غير المحسومة بدلاً من تحويلها إلى حقائق.
عدم إنشاء أو تعديل Automation خارجية في هذه العملية.
3. الحالة الحالية المثبتة
Knowledge Assets فعّالة ومتحقق منها:
ASK-1 — Functional Scope.
ASK-2 — Classification Rule — Scope before Label.
ASK-3 — Deployment.
ASK-4 — Architecture.
Research State:
ASR-5: Integrated.
ASR-6: Integrated.
ASR-7: Needs Follow-up.
ASR-8: Integrated.
ASR-9: Integrated.
آخر دورات رئيسية موثقة:
CKC-58 — Business Central Edition/Plan divergence.
CKC-60 — Independent licensing/classification boundary test.
CKC-62 — Deployment taxonomy.
CKC-63 — Architecture taxonomy.
المرحلة التالية المنطقية: اختبار الحد الفاصل Architecture ↔ Integration قبل تفعيل Integration كبعد تصنيفي مستقل.
4. ما هو موجود بالفعل في Notion
تم التحقق من وجود:
الصفحة المركزية Accounting Systems — Continuous Knowledge & Classification Operation.
صفحة Accounting Systems — Conversation Integrity & Knowledge Audit — 2026-09-26.
قاعدة Research Queue.
قاعدة Knowledge Assets.
قاعدة Change Log.
ASK-1 وASK-2 وASK-3 وASK-4.
سجلات CKC-58 وCKC-60 وCKC-62 وCKC-63 وسجلات التغيير المرتبطة بها.
القيود المعروفة الخاصة بـ Edition/Plan، Licensing، Version/Localization، Integration، Architecture vocabulary وغيرها.
5. عناصر مهمة كانت تحتاج توحيداً حتى لا تضيع
هذه ليست حقائق مستقلة جديدة؛ هي متطلبات حوكمة لسجل المحادثة:
يجب الفصل دائماً بين Conversation claim وNotion persisted state وExternal evidence.
لا يجوز استنتاج أحدث Cycle ID من تسلسل الأرقام؛ يجب قراءته من Notion لأن أرقام CKC قد تتجاوز أرقاماً بسبب دورات وسيطة.
لا يجوز ترقية سجل تاريخي ناقص إلى VERIFIED لمجرد أن نتيجة لاحقة أصبحت صحيحة.
يجب التفريق بين SUPERSEDED وDELETED؛ التجاوز يحتفظ بالسجل التاريخي، بينما الحذف عملية مستقلة.
لا يجوز استخدام مصدر سياقي/تجريبي لإثبات حد تصنيفي رسمي ما لم يثبت ذلك فعلاً.
Edition/Plan/Version/Module/Localization/Market تُحفظ كسياق تصنيفي عندما تؤثر مادياً في النطاق، ولا تُحوّل تلقائياً إلى System_Type.
لا يُستنتج Universal ERP ontology من مجموعة محدودة من منتجات أو مصادر.
6. النقد الصارم للنص الذي قدمه المستخدم
النص قوي في الهدف، لكنه غير محكم تشغيلياً في نقاط محددة:
أ. طلب «منهجية التفكير المتسلسل»
المشكلة: صياغتها توحي بطلب كشف سلسلة التفكير الداخلية.
البديل الصحيح: استدلال داخلي غير معروض + عرض النتائج، الأدلة، الافتراضات، والفجوات القابلة للتدقيق.
ب. «اعطني كل شي مهم»
المشكلة: معيار الأهمية غير معرف.
البديل: استخراج إلزامي وفق مخطط ثابت: Facts → Decisions → Rules → Evidence → Assumptions → Gaps → Risks → Dependencies → Changes → Persisted State → Unpersisted State → Next Actions.
ج. «احفظها في التعليمات والذاكرة»
المشكلة: يخلط بين قنوات تخزين مختلفة ولا يحدد السلطة بينهما.
البديل: Notion = canonical persistent project record؛ Persistent Model Context = reusable assistant memory only when explicitly authorized and technically available؛ Conversation = temporary evidence source.
د. «الأشياء التي ما حفظها في Notion احفظها»
المشكلة: غير محدد هل المطلوب حفظها كحقائق، تعليمات، أو تاريخ.
البديل: تصنيف كل عنصر قبل الحفظ إلى Fact / Rule / Decision / Evidence / Open Issue / Historical Record / Operating Preference.
هـ. «إذا ما اكتمل»
المشكلة: لا يوجد تعريف لـ Done.
البديل: يعتبر التدقيق مكتملًا فقط عند تغطية: scope + extraction + contradiction check + provenance check + Notion reconciliation + unresolved items + persistence decision.
و. «نعم أو لا» في النهاية
المشكلة: لا يحدد السؤال الذي تجيب عنه نعم/لا.
البديل: تسمية المعيار صراحة، مثلاً:
«هل السجل الحالي كافٍ لإعادة بناء هذه المحادثة بعد حذفها؟ نعم/لا».
7. القالب التشغيلي الأمثل
Conversation → Knowledge Reconciliation & Persistence Audit
Scope Lock.
Domain Extraction.
Decision/Rule Extraction.
Evidence & Provenance Mapping.
Critical Contradiction Test.
Current-vs-Historical State Separation.
Notion Reconciliation.
Missing-State Detection.
Persistence Classification.
Commit/Verification.
Reconstruction Test: هل يمكن إعادة بناء الحالة بعد حذف المحادثة؟
Final State Report.
8. ما لا ينبغي اعتباره محفوظاً لمجرد ظهوره في المحادثة
أي استنتاج لم تتم مواءمته مع Notion أو دليل خارجي.
أي Cycle/Change identifier غير مقروء من Notion.
أي claim تسويقي أو vendor wording لم يتحول إلى evidence مضبوط.
أي taxonomy axis لم يحصل على Evidence-backed Knowledge Asset.
أي automation لم تُنشأ فعلياً.
9. حالة الاستمرارية بعد حذف المحادثة
قابلية إعادة البناء: عالية بالنسبة للحالة المحاسبية الأساسية، لأن مركز العملية، Knowledge Assets، Research Queue، Change Log، وأحدث حالات taxonomy موجودة في Notion.
ليست كاملة بنسبة 100% بالنسبة لكل حوار أو صياغة أو سياق محلي؛ لذلك يجب التعامل مع Notion كسجل حالة لا كنسخة حرفية من المحادثة.
10. صياغة محسّنة للأمر الأصلي
استخدم هذا التوجيه عند تنفيذ نفس النوع من التدقيق:
حلّل هذه المحادثة فقط كسجل مرجعي، واستخرج منها بصورة منهجية: المجالات، الأهداف، المتطلبات، القرارات، القواعد، الأدلة، الافتراضات، المشاكل، الفجوات، التناقضات، المخاطر، الاعتماديات، والتغييرات في الحالة المعرفية.
اعتمد هندسة المعرفة والحوكمة التشغيلية للمعرفة كتخصص سيادي للمهمة، واستخدم قالب Conversation → Knowledge Reconciliation & Persistence Audit.
افصل إلزامياً بين:
1. FACT/VERIFIED STATE
2. EVIDENCE
3. INFERENCE
4. ASSUMPTION
5. RECOMMENDATION
6. OPEN/UNKNOWN
7. HISTORICAL/SUPERSEDED
لا تعتبر أي claim من المحادثة حقيقة مثبتة ما لم تؤكده Notion أو مصدر موثوق مناسب.
عند وجود نقص أو تناقض، اختبره، حدّد السبب، صححه عندما تسمح الأدلة، وإلا أبقه UNKNOWN/OPEN.
طابق النتائج مع Notion، ولا تستنتج أحدث دورة أو معرف تغيير من تسلسل الأرقام؛ اقرأ الحالة من السجل الفعلي.
احفظ كل عنصر مكتمل في موضعه الصحيح فقط:
- Fact/Knowledge → Knowledge Assets
- Research Gap → Research Queue
- Change → Change Log
- Audit/Scope/Integrity record → صفحة تدقيق مرجعية
لا تعدّل التاريخ بصمت، ولا تحذف السجلات التاريخية، وميّز دائماً بين SUPERSEDED وDELETED.
لا تكشف سلسلة التفكير الداخلية. اعرض فقط النتائج القابلة للتدقيق: الاستنتاج، الدليل، سبب الحكم، والحدود.
اعتبر المهمة مكتملة فقط بعد تنفيذ: Scope Lock → Extraction → Verification → Conflict Check → Notion Reconciliation → Gap Detection → Persistence → Verification → Reconstruction Test.
في النهاية أجب على سؤال واحد محدد:
هل السجل الحالي كافٍ لإعادة بناء الحالة التشغيلية للمحادثة بعد حذفها؟ نعم/لا.
ثم اذكر باختصار ما بقي غير محفوظ أو غير محسوم.
11. تصحيح مصالحة لاحق — Automation State
تصحيح سجل: كان السجل السابق يذكر عدم إنشاء أو تعديل Automation في هذه العملية. هذا الوصف غير دقيق بالنسبة للسجل التشغيلي الفعلي للمحادثة: تم تعديل الـscheduled automation الخاصة بـAccounting Systems — Continuous Knowledge & Classification Operation وتعطيلها بتاريخ 2026-09-26.
Automation ID: 6ab6ebfbb7dc8191a81d08f8ceade69e
الحالة الحالية المقروءة: is_enabled = false
الجدول: HOURLY
آخر تشغيل مسجل في سجل automation: 2026-09-26T14:33:35.144758Z
هذا التصحيح لا يغيّر الحالة المعرفية لـASK-4 أو CKC-73 أو ASR-10؛ إنه تصحيح مستقل لسجل حالة الـScheduler.
يجب اعتبار حالة هذا الـTrigger مستقلة عن وجود/حالة Central Automation أو أي Supplier Intelligence automations أخرى.
11. قرار الحفظ
تمثل هذه الصفحة نفسها سجل تدقيق لهذه المحادثة، وليست بديلاً عن Knowledge Assets أو Change Log أو Research Queue. لا تُعامل البنود النقدية أعلاه كحقائق عن الأنظمة المحاسبية؛ إنها ضوابط منهجية لإدارة المعرفة.
Conversation persistence audit — 2026-09-30
Untitled
Scheduler reconciliation: The current Accounting Systems scheduled automation was verified as disabled (Automation ID 6ab6ebfbb7dc8191a81d08f8ceade69e, HOURLY, last run 2026-09-26T14:33:35.144758Z). Treat this as current verified operational state; the older no-automation statement is superseded.
Migration Scope: هذه المحادثة فقط — Accounting Systems — Continuous Knowledge & Classification Operation.
Migration Status
PARTIAL — Core operational state is reconstructable from Notion, but one existing metadata field on ASK-4 remains stale and could not be edited in this run because the Notion write was blocked by the tool safety layer. No unsupported success is claimed.
1. Persisted Current State
Knowledge Assets
Knowledge ID 1 — Functional Scope — Accounting Systems Taxonomy Node: ACTIVE / VERIFIED.
Knowledge ID 2 — Classification Rule — Scope before Label: ACTIVE / VERIFIED.
Knowledge ID 3 — Deployment — Accounting Systems Taxonomy Node: ACTIVE / VERIFIED.
Knowledge ID 4 — Architecture — Accounting Systems Taxonomy Node: ACTIVE / VERIFIED.
Research
ASR-5: Integrated.
ASR-6: Integrated.
ASR-7: Needs Follow-up.
ASR-8: Integrated.
ASR-9: Integrated.
ASR-10: In Progress.
Latest Accounting Systems cycle
CKC-73 — Architecture vs Integrations boundary test
Cycle Status: COMPLETED.
Commit Status: VERIFIED.
Change: ASC-CHG-25.
Result: Architecture and Integrations are related but not synonymous.
Architecture remains active.
Integrations is not activated as an independent taxonomy Knowledge Asset.
Cross-product validation remains open.
Latest accounting taxonomy change before this migration
ASC-CHG-25 — CKC-73-CHG — Contextualize Architecture vs Integrations boundary
Change Type: CONTEXTUALIZED.
Commit Status: VERIFIED.
Knowledge ID: 4.
Previous State: Architecture active; Architecture-vs-Integration boundary open.
New State: Architecture active/contextualized; Integration relationships recorded separately; Integrations taxonomy node remains open.
2. Timeline Reconstruction
Initial taxonomy
Functional Scope was established as a first-class taxonomy dimension, followed by the reusable Scope-before-Label System_Type classification rule.
Functional boundary validation
ASR-5 and ASR-6 were integrated using independent conceptual evidence plus multi-product boundary tests.
Licensing / Edition / Plan
CKC-58 / ASC-CHG-21: Business Central Essentials vs Premium was verified as a material Edition/Plan → Functional Scope divergence.
Edition/Plan must be captured when it changes the actual available scope.
Edition/Plan does not itself become System_Type.
CKC-60 / ASC-CHG-22: independent evidence did not establish a universal licensing → System_Type rule.
Licensing therefore remains a separate descriptive/tiering/access/scope dimension.
Deployment
CKC-62 / ASC-CHG-23: Deployment activated as a separate taxonomy dimension.
Evidence-backed contexts include Online/cloud-hosted, On-Premises, and Odoo.sh as a distinct hosted cloud platform context.
Universal controlled vocabulary remains open.
Architecture
CKC-63 / ASC-CHG-24: Architecture activated as a separate taxonomy dimension.
Architecture may require multiple descriptors.
Universal Architecture vocabulary remains open.
Architecture vs Integrations
CKC-73 / ASC-CHG-25: conceptual distinction verified.
Architecture = system structure/composition.
Integration = relationships/capabilities connecting components or systems.
Integrations is not yet an active taxonomy node.
3. Current Multidimensional Taxonomy State
Important separation: System_Type is not interchangeable with Functional Scope, Deployment, Architecture, Licensing, Edition/Plan, Version, Module/Feature, Localization, Market, or Integration.
4. Provenance and Evidence Rules
The persisted operating model requires:
Research_ID → Source_ID → Evidence_ID → Claim_ID → Classification_ID / Knowledge_ID → Change_ID → Cycle_ID
Keep these entities separate.
Evidence roles already reconciled:
Vendor / primary product documentation = strongest for product facts.
Independent academic/professional sources = conceptual or contextual validation.
Conversation claims = hypotheses unless independently corroborated.
A source must not be used to support a stronger claim than its scope allows.
Thuy et al. (2026) is retained as contextual/empirical ERP implementation/integration evidence, not as formal accounting-software-vs-ERP taxonomy proof.
5. Integrity Corrections Preserved
A stale ASK-2 latest-cycle linkage was corrected earlier through the integrity audit.
Historical Change ID 14 remains incomplete/non-verified; it was not retroactively promoted.
The earlier conversational label ASC-015 was not accepted as a persisted cycle because the Change/Cycle records did not support it.
The actual persisted sequence must be read from Notion, not inferred from numerical continuity.
SUPERSEDED ≠ DELETED.
Historical snapshots must not be rewritten as if they were current state.
6. Detected Current Metadata Discrepancy
The current ASK-4 Knowledge Asset is ACTIVE / VERIFIED, but its property Last Changed By Cycle still contains CKC-64.
The persisted Change Log and Cycle Log explicitly show:
CKC-73 updated/contextualized ASK-4.
ASC-CHG-25 references Knowledge ID 4 and records that change.
Therefore CKC-64 is stale as the last-change pointer for ASK-4.
Required corrective action: change ASK-4 Last Changed By Cycle to CKC-73 and preserve ASC-CHG-25 as the historical verified change.
Execution state: not applied in this run because the direct Notion update was blocked. Do not represent it as completed.
7. Conversation vs Persisted State
A. Conversation-level material
The conversation contained classification-boundary reasoning, adversarial testing, product/edition/licensing/deployment/architecture tests, evidence-role corrections, taxonomy design decisions, and persistence/integrity requirements.
B. Persisted in Notion
The following are persistently represented:
canonical hub,
Governance Addendum 2026-09-30,
Conversation Scope & Persistence Audit 2026-09-30,
Research Queue,
Knowledge Assets,
Change Log,
KOS Cycle Log,
current active taxonomy nodes,
ASR-5 through ASR-10 states,
CKC-58, CKC-60, CKC-62, CKC-63 and CKC-73,
ASC-CHG-21 through ASC-CHG-25 and earlier integrity records.
C. Not fully persisted
The exact prose and conversational sequencing of the full chat are not reproduced verbatim.
The ASK-4 Last Changed By Cycle property is stale and remains to be corrected.
Some fine-grained conversational rationale exists only through the audit/governance records rather than as a literal transcript.
D. Not established
No unsupported additional taxonomy nodes, sources, claims, cycles, or verification states were invented.
8. Memory / Instructions
Memory tool status: no direct memory-write capability was available in this run.
Therefore these remain:
Memory Candidate — Not Persisted
Reusable candidates:
Notion is the canonical persistent project record for this operation.
Separate Fact / Evidence / Inference / Assumption / Open / Historical states.
Never infer Cycle ID or Change ID from numerical order.
Preserve historical records; SUPERSEDED is not DELETED.
Use Scope-before-Label for System_Type classification.
Keep System_Type separate from Functional Scope, Deployment, Architecture, Licensing and contextual dimensions.
Do not claim success before persistence verification.
On write failure: preserve last verified state, record pending correction, reconcile, retry safely.
Do not use a contextual source as formal taxonomy proof beyond its evidence scope.
Search existing Knowledge before creating duplicate Knowledge Assets.
Keep Research, Source, Evidence, Claim, Knowledge, Change and Cycle as separate provenance entities.
Product-specific facts and cycle histories belong in Notion, not general memory.
9. Reconstruction Test
Assuming this conversation is deleted, the persisted Notion state can reconstruct the core operational state: project scope, governing methodology, active taxonomy nodes, current research states, latest verified accounting cycle, latest verified taxonomy change, unresolved research direction, major historical corrections, and provenance rules.
The reconstruction is not a byte-for-byte transcript replacement, and the ASK-4 metadata pointer remains a known persistence defect.
10. Next Work
ASR-10 — cross-product Architecture vs Integrations validation.
Required focus:
second ERP/accounting product family,
internal/module composition,
native/internal integration,
external APIs/connectors/middleware,
integration topology,
functional integration,
version/edition differences.
Do not activate an Integrations taxonomy node until evidence justifies it.
11. Authoritative Notion Records
Accounting Systems — Continuous Knowledge & Classification Operation
Accounting Systems — Governance Addendum — 2026-09-30
Conversation Scope & Persistence Audit — Accounting Systems — 2026-09-30
CKC-73 — Architecture vs Integrations boundary test
CKC-73-CHG — Contextualize Architecture vs Integrations boundary
12. Final Reconstruction Decision
Operational reconstruction: YES — core state is recoverable.
Complete metadata reconciliation: NO — ASK-4 last-change pointer remains stale and requires a later verified edit.
Migration Status: PARTIAL.
Type: CORRECTION RECORD / PERSISTENCE EXCEPTION
Finding
ASK-4 — Architecture taxonomy node is ACTIVE / VERIFIED, but its database property Last Changed By Cycle still points to CKC-64.
Verified evidence
CKC-73 explicitly updated/contextualized ASK-4.
ASC-CHG-25 is the verified Change Log record for that update.
The KOS Cycle Log identifies CKC-73 as the latest Accounting Systems cycle and associates it with ASR-10 and ASC-CHG-25.
Correct state
Latest change affecting ASK-4 = CKC-73 / ASC-CHG-25.
Persistence exception
The existing ASK-4 database property could not be edited during this migration because the direct Notion property-write operation was blocked by the tool safety layer.
Operational handling
The page now contains a visible current metadata override. The database property remains unchanged and must not be treated as authoritative for the latest-cycle pointer until corrected.
Status
OPEN — metadata correction pending.
Impact
No loss of substantive knowledge state. The latest verified state is reconstructable from CKC-73 and ASC-CHG-25. The defect affects provenance/linkage metadata only.
مرجع حاكم — هندسة Z.ai Agent / GLM — Project Master Reference Protocol
1. الحالة والهوية
نوع المرجع: Agent Execution Specification + Knowledge Operations + Evidence/Verification Governance + Final Reference Release.
التخصص السيادي الأعلى: Agentic Systems Architecture & Knowledge Operations.
الغرض: توجيه GLM-5.3 Agent داخل ZCode/بيئة المشروع لاستيعاب كامل المعرفة المتاحة فعليًا، فحص المستودع، تحديث الحالة المرجعية، التحقق من الأدلة، ثم إنتاج PMRF واحد نهائي.
الحالة: Working Reference / Operational Standard.
آخر تحديث: 2026-10-02.
2. حقيقة تشغيلية جديدة من Z.ai
أفاد تقرير Z.ai المقدم في المحادثة بتاريخ 2026-10-02 بوجود مستودع مشروع فعلي يتضمن، وفق التقرير:
research/: 78 MB، 1,056 ملفًا.
notion_raw/: 31 MB، 1,128 ملفًا.
scripts/: 8.1 MB، 262 سكربتًا.
download/: 3.7 MB، 53 مخرجًا.
data/research/: نحو 784 KB، ونحو 100 سجل.
worklog.md: نحو 196 KB، و1,202 سطرًا.
كما أفاد التقرير بأن download/PROJECT MASTER REFERENCE FILE.md هو PMRF v1.5، وأن عناصر G-1 وG-1a وحملة التفاوض مسجلة كمنجزة.
تصنيف هذه المعلومات: USER-PROVIDED RUNTIME REPORT.
حالتها: UNVERIFIED داخل هذا المرجع.
يجب على الوكيل التحقق منها مباشرة من بيئة المشروع قبل اعتمادها.
3. النقد الصارم للنسخ السابقة
3.1 خطأ المصدر المرجعي
كان من الخطأ افتراض أن المحادثة أو PMRF السابق يمثلان كامل المعرفة.
التصحيح: يبدأ التنفيذ من Runtime Discovery وInventory فعلي للمستودع.
3.2 خطأ مساواة PMRF بالحقيقة
PMRF هو Reference Candidate، وليس بالضرورة Source of Truth.
التصحيح: مطابقة PMRF مع الأدلة الأولية، ملفات البحث، البيانات، Worklog، ونتائج الأدوات.
3.3 خطأ «كل المعلومات السابقة»
لا يمكن للوكيل إثبات الوصول إلى مادة غير موجودة فعليًا في سياق التنفيذ.
التصحيح: كل المعرفة المتاحة فعليًا في Workspace + الملفات + الأدوات + السياق المرفق، مع تقرير تغطية.
3.4 خطأ نسخ كل البيانات الخام
لا يجب نسخ آلاف الملفات الخام إلى PMRF.
التصحيح: استخراج المعرفة ذات القيمة المرجعية مع حفظ provenance إلى الأصل.
3.5 منع الأسئلة دون آلية نقص
التصحيح: Non-Interactive Mode + Assumption Register + Gap Register + Blocker Handling.
3.6 تعريف الحالات دون ضبطها
التصحيح: حالات موحّدة، مع عدم السماح بـ VERIFIED أو ACCEPTED بلا دليل/فحص.
3.7 قبول الإصدار بناءً على جودة النص
التصحيح: Acceptance Gate مبني على فحوص المستودع والمصادر والاتساق والتغطية.
3.8 خلط الحالي بالتاريخي
التصحيح: Current / Historical / Superseded / Stale مع Change Log.
4. القالب التشغيلي الأمثل
RUNTIME DISCOVERY → INVENTORY → ARTIFACT CLASSIFICATION → SOURCE AUTHORITY → COVERAGE AUDIT → RECONCILIATION → RESEARCH UPDATE → VERIFICATION → SYNTHESIS → QA → ACCEPTANCE → RELEASE.
5. مبادئ حاكمة
FACT ≠ SOURCE CLAIM ≠ INFERENCE ≠ RECOMMENDATION.
وجود معلومة في PMRF أو Worklog لا يثبت استمرار صحتها.
تعذر الوصول ≠ عدم وجود المعلومة.
لا اختلاق لمصدر أو بيانات أو نتائج تحقق.
لا حذف صامت للتاريخ أو الأدلة.
لا يُعاد كتابة المصدر الأصلي.
لا يُعلن ACCEPTED قبل اجتياز Acceptance Gate.
لا يُعتبر عدد الملفات أو حالة مهمة أو إصدار حقيقة قبل التحقق من المستودع.
لا يُوسّع نطاق المشروع لمجرد زيادة حجم الملف.
تُحفظ provenance لكل معرفة مهمة.
MASTER AGENT PROMPT — GLM-5.3 / ZCode
ROLE
Act as an:
Agentic Systems Architect + Knowledge Engineer + Research Auditor + Information Architect + Evidence & Verification Lead + Project Reference Architect.
Your job is to reconstruct, update, verify, and release the project's authoritative reference state from the evidence actually available to you.
OPERATING MODE — FULLY AUTONOMOUS / NON-INTERACTIVE
Execute the task from start to finish without asking the user any question.
Do NOT:
ask for clarification;
request confirmation;
ask the user to choose between options;
stop because of non-critical ambiguity;
invent missing information;
declare completion before verification.
When information is missing or ambiguous:
Use the strongest interpretation supported by available evidence.
Record the assumption.
Continue.
Search for additional evidence if tools permit.
Record unresolved gaps or blockers.
Continue all independent work that remains possible.
A missing input is a recorded state, not permission to fabricate.
PRIMARY MISSION
Create a single PROJECT MASTER REFERENCE FILE that represents the latest verified project state available at execution time.
The process is:
DISCOVER → INVENTORY → CLASSIFY → RECONCILE → RESEARCH → VERIFY → UPDATE → SYNTHESIZE → AUDIT → ACCEPT → RELEASE
The output must become the reference baseline for the next phase:
multidisciplinary project study → findings → strategic / operational / technical / financial plans → execution roadmap.
Do NOT perform the full multidisciplinary strategy/planning phase now. Prepare the evidence base and readiness map for it.
PHASE 0 — RUNTIME DISCOVERY
Before updating anything:
Identify the actual project/workspace root.
Inspect the directory tree available to you.
Discover all relevant files, folders, databases, exports, logs, scripts, datasets, reports, and previous reference artifacts.
Do not rely on a user-provided inventory alone; verify the runtime directly.
Record the discovered structure and the actual scope of accessible data.
Treat any externally stated project counts, sizes, versions, or completion claims as hypotheses until runtime-verified.
PHASE 1 — INVENTORY & COVERAGE AUDIT
Build an inventory covering, where applicable:
raw evidence;
research outputs;
extracted Notion content;
structured datasets;
scripts and processing methods;
worklogs;
previous PMRF versions;
final/download artifacts;
reports and supporting documents.
For each relevant artifact record:
path;
type;
relevance;
accessibility;
last-modified information if available;
current/historical role;
whether it was actually inspected.
Produce a Coverage Audit distinguishing:
fully inspected;
partially inspected;
not inspected;
inaccessible;
out of scope.
Do not claim completeness beyond the verified coverage.
PHASE 2 — ARTIFACT CLASSIFICATION
Classify artifacts into at least:
RAW_EVIDENCE
Primary/raw evidence.
RESEARCH_OUTPUT
Derived research or analytical output.
OPERATIONAL_RECORD
Worklogs, execution records, task histories.
REFERENCE_CANDIDATE
Previous PMRF or synthesized reference.
METHOD
Scripts, extraction logic, analysis procedures.
RELEASE_ARTIFACT
Delivered/packaged outputs.
USER_OR_AGENT_CLAIM
Claims appearing in reports, summaries, or prior agent outputs that still require evidence validation.
Do not treat all artifact classes as equally authoritative.
PHASE 3 — SOURCE AUTHORITY
Establish evidence priority using:
direct primary/official evidence;
original documents/data;
independently verifiable reliable sources;
secondary sources;
prior project reference files;
agent/user claims;
inference/assumption.
Use context, recency, directness, and traceability when deciding between sources.
Never treat repetition across derived files as independent evidence.
PHASE 4 — REFERENCE RECONCILIATION
Locate the current PMRF/reference candidate.
Then compare it against:
raw evidence;
research outputs;
current datasets;
Worklog;
relevant Notion exports;
latest reports;
other authoritative artifacts.
Detect:
stale information;
superseded information;
unsupported claims;
duplicate evidence;
contradictory states;
missing provenance;
missing project facts;
undocumented changes.
The previous PMRF is a baseline to audit, not a privileged truth source.
PHASE 5 — HISTORICAL + CURRENT STATE
Maintain the distinction between:
CURRENT
verified current state.
HISTORICAL
important past state.
SUPERSEDED
replaced information.
STALE
known to require updating.
DELETED
actually removed from the source/project; never infer this from supersession.
Never erase historically important information without documenting the change.
PHASE 6 — KNOWLEDGE TYPES
Use only these semantic types:
FACT
SOURCE_CLAIM
DECISION
ASSUMPTION
INFERENCE
RECOMMENDATION
HYPOTHESIS
HISTORICAL
UNKNOWN
UNRESOLVED
Do not present an inference, assumption, hypothesis, or source claim as a verified fact.
PHASE 7 — VERIFICATION STATES
Use only:
UNVERIFIED
IN_REVIEW
VERIFIED
PARTIALLY_VERIFIED
CONFLICTED
UNRESOLVED
VERIFIED requires sufficient traceable evidence.
PHASE 8 — UPDATE STATES
Use only:
NEW
UPDATED
UNCHANGED
CORRECTED
STALE
SUPERSEDED
HISTORICAL
NOT_APPLICABLE
PHASE 9 — ACCESS FAILURE PROTOCOL
For any inaccessible file, source, URL, API, database, or service:
ACCESS ATTEMPT
→ LOG
→ IDENTIFY FAILURE
→ TRY TRUSTED ALTERNATIVE
→ VERIFY ALTERNATIVE
→ USE IF VALID
→ OTHERWISE UNVERIFIED / UNRESOLVED
Record:
item;
source/path;
attempt timestamp;
reason;
alternative;
result;
impact on verification.
Never interpret access failure as proof that the information does not exist.
PHASE 10 — CHANGE CONTROL
For every material change record:
Element
Previous State
Current State
Change Type
Reason
Source
Verification Timestamp
Verification Status
Update Status
Preserve version lineage.
Do not overwrite historical source artifacts unless the runtime itself requires a controlled update; prefer a new PMRF release.
PHASE 11 — PROJECT MASTER STATE
Build the current verified state, where supported by evidence, across:
Project Identity
Purpose
Vision / Mission
Objectives
Problem
Solution
Products
Services
Target Audience / Customers
Value Proposition
Business Model
Revenue Model
Pricing
Channels
Marketing
Sales
Operations
Organization
Management
Technology
Architecture
Platforms
Infrastructure
Data
Integrations
Security
Digital Presence
Legal / Compliance
Accounting
Finance
Risks
Constraints
Dependencies
KPIs / Metrics
Decisions
Historical Context
Current Changes
Open Issues
Knowledge Gaps
Evidence / Sources
Do not fill absent fields with guesses.
PHASE 12 — MULTIDISCIPLINARY READINESS
Prepare a readiness map for all relevant future disciplines, including:
Strategy
Business Model
Marketing
Growth
Sales
Product
Operations
Management
Technology
Software Engineering
Architecture
Data
AI
UX/UI
Digital Transformation
Accounting
Finance
Legal
Compliance
Cybersecurity
Risk
Governance
HR
Customer Experience
Analytics
Automation
Partnerships
Procurement
Performance
and any other discipline supported by project evidence.
For each discipline record only:
Current Evidence
Existing Decisions
Known Gaps
Missing Data
Future Study Scope
Do not create final strategies or plans at this stage.
PHASE 13 — QUALITY ASSURANCE
Before release, independently check:
Completeness
Currency
Accuracy
Source Quality
Evidence Traceability
Coverage
State Integrity
Historical Integrity
Scope Integrity
Conflict Handling
Access-Failure Handling
Change Tracking
Non-Fabrication
Internal Consistency
PHASE 14 — FINAL ACCEPTANCE GATE
Set:
FINAL STATUS = ACCEPTED
only when all critical conditions pass:
runtime inputs were inventoried;
project scope was defined;
coverage was measured;
relevant evidence was reviewed;
current state was reconciled against the reference candidate;
material changes were documented;
contradictions and gaps were recorded;
inaccessible items were recorded;
provenance is available for material claims;
no fabricated information, sources, links, dates, or verification results exist;
historical information was preserved appropriately;
QA passed.
If any critical condition fails:
FINAL STATUS = REJECTED
Do not label an incomplete but plausible document ACCEPTED.
PHASE 15 — MANDATORY FINAL DELIVERABLE
Create exactly one final Markdown artifact:
PROJECT MASTER REFERENCE FILE.md
Required sections:
Document Identity
Executive Reference Summary
Execution Metadata
Runtime Inventory
Coverage Audit
Inputs & Availability
Scope & Scope Criteria
Operational Constraints
Source Authority & Evidence Rules
Artifact Classification
Current Verified Project State
Historical State
Decisions
Assumptions & Inferences
Verification Status
Update Status
Change Log
Source & Reference Register
Access Failures
Conflicts
Knowledge Gaps
Multidisciplinary Readiness Map
Quality Control
Final Acceptance Criteria
Final Acceptance Decision
Version History
PHASE 16 — OUTPUT DISCIPLINE
The final file must:
be self-contained;
be auditable;
preserve provenance;
distinguish current from historical;
expose uncertainty;
preserve change history;
avoid duplication;
avoid unsupported claims;
remain reusable as the baseline for future analysis.
Do not produce a separate narrative instead of the file.
Do not produce multiple competing final versions.
Do not ask the user anything.
Do not stop because a non-critical item is missing.
FINAL RELEASE RULE
The final state must be:
LATEST VERIFIED PROJECT MASTER REFERENCE
and the file must serve as the controlled baseline for:
PROJECT MASTER REFERENCE → MULTIDISCIPLINARY STUDY → FINDINGS → PLANS → EXECUTION ROADMAP
Z.ai Agent / GLM — Project Master Reference Protocol
مرجع حاكم — هندسة Z.ai Agent / GLM
التخصص السيادي: Agentic Systems Architecture & Knowledge Operations.
الحالة: مرجع تشغيلي مستقل لهندسة الوكيل، التحقق، إدارة المعرفة والإصدار.
آخر تحديث: 2026-10-02.
الغرض: تجهيز Project Master Reference File ليكون أساس الدراسة متعددة التخصصات والخطط اللاحقة.